So, to fill the time spaces in pre-recorded TV shows that are normally for commercial ads…all of the TV stations in Japan put messages from AC Japan in their place.
Russia and China voted against it, as expected. Russian Ambassador to the UN Vitaly Churkin lashed out at the resolution, saying it was one-sided and failed to condemn the opposition for their part of the violence as it does condemn the government. The resolution is in line with what Moscow sees as a trend “to isolate the Syrian leadership, reject any contacts with it, and impose a form of political settlement from abroad”.
2 amount
If you want to be of use to God, maintain the proper relationship with Jesus Christ by staying focused on Him, and He will make use of you every minute you live— yet you will be unaware, on the conscious level of your life, that you are being used of Him
Love Generation
Our Daily Bread designs has a brand new team! It's an Alumni team! Some of our past designers have returned and will be sharing special projects with you bi-monthly on Thursdays! You can read all about it on the ODBD Blog today!
We devoured them with butter (plain salted or honey butter), but they would be excellent with soup or stew as well, or just plain. They are sweet and darkly fragrant, so soft and with that enviable tears-apart-in-long-shreds quality that I always seek in soft breads.
This is where I don't know what happens for sure.I assume if I've had a good response from the Clomid and have at least one good size follie on the left I go home wait for the nurse to call with lab results and we decide if I should take the hcg trigger shot and when. This shot will force my ovaries to drop all the mature eggs. And then the next day we go in for the actual IUI.
The statement added that any profits accruing to the 51 percent stakes “should be regarded as property of the state”, and that other companies transacting with mining firms should remember that they are dealing with the government.
When Balthazar agrees to help Skye Tierney, a human girl who once attended Evernight Academy, he has no idea how dangerous it will be. Skye’s newfound psychic powers have caught the attention of Redgrave, the cruel, seductive master vampire responsible for murdering Balthazar and his family four centuries ago. Now Redgrave plans to use Skye’s powers for his own evil purposes.
“Ron”: Well, it depends on what you want to use it for.
Woot!!! I'm so excited to see the arcs of Fairy Bad day! My photos don't really do them justice but I can assure you that they are gorgeous!!!!!! Like seriously gorgeous!!!!
The film was written by Cameron Crowe and is based on the 1981 book of the same name. Crowe was a freelance writer for Rolling Stone Magazine and had gone undercover at a San Diego High School. He then wrote of his experiences in the book.
It's funny the way this is worded. My parents just got a new refrigerator, and at one point, the contents were removed and placed on the floor. So maybe it isn't that crazy an idea. My kids have never tried to empty the contents of the refrigerator onto the floor, so I don't know if I would allow it. But I might use it as an opportunity to wipe the shelves before I put everything away again. I wouldn't consider it that different from the kids taking out their toys or art supplies to play with.
Row 4- (1sc in 2, 2sc in next) around (24)
oh, and first a comment. my comment . . . thank you. thanks a lot for all or your kind words (and unkind - those were deleted . . . i mean c'mon. my cat just died.).
Andy's Vietnamese relatives own a restaurant. Andy believes it to be, well, a real restaurant; instead, it turns out to be little more than a cafe, where locals buy food and eat quickly. No menus, no napkins, nothing that Andy associates with "restaurant." The food -- the food is so delicious, its descriptions so strong, that I want Vietnamese food and I want it now. The recipes Starke includes in the book makes me that much more hungry. KOTO, a restaurant to help Vietnamese street children become skilled and employable, is mentioned; and so Starke weaves together the realities of street children, food, tourism, business.
Film five vlogs, plan more
The counsel to be so appointed must be a man or woman of proven integrity with a team of Lawyers recommended by the Nigerian Bar Association working with such private prosecutor. Civil society organisations should also be allowed to appoint their own counsel as observers.
1 yard - American Crafts Ribbon - Denim
The applied science program was originally proposed to be based in Downtown Brooklyn at a long-abandoned building, of which the Metropolitan Transportation Authority (MTA) has a long-term lease. Elected officials and stakeholders preferred a City-based institution utilizing the space. Council Member James supported a science program hosted by New York University and the nearby Polytechnic Institute, which have an existing partnership.
More importantly, again invoking the precedent of John Dewey, any useful praxis must continue beyond the limits of a semester. We must pay more attention to the definition, cultivation and reinforcement of lasting epistemic virtues that cross subject boundaries – attentiveness, benevolence, creativity, compassion, curiosity, inclusion, objectivity, tenacity, and wisdom.
24-What do you consider your greatest achievement?
Happily, all this is set to change. If successful, it will be a great transformation for the Royal Malaysian Police and a great legacy for our IGP.
Wednesday - now - Goth is planning a conference call with AI (and it will not be polite)
I have been RIDICULOUSLY out of touch with Oscars this year, or movies really. I didn’t even make my usual most anticipated list, and I’m struggling trying to think of what will be “big”. By de facto I want to see Hugo because I adore Scorsese and I really will watch anything he does, but in terms of Oscar prognosticating. I predicted, foolishly perhaps, in June that The Descendants would
I'm going to do an entire post on the Peking Acrobats because the act was truly amazing. It was a different show from last year but the feats of strength, focus, and balance were incredible. However, there was one act that, while amazing and awe-inspiring, also had a few moments of body positioning that was a little... unique.
Brown said Vuillard’s work after 1900 was frequently viewed as a retreat into conservatism. Although he worked during a period that spanned Impressionism, Cubism, Expressionism and abstraction, the artist remained committed to the techniques and subjects of his youth.
In any case–I’m not going to link to the contribution directly–because I don’t necessarily want people to intrude into her space (although I’ll change this is she wants..)–but if you are somewhat clever and know me–you might be able to locate the contribution and then indulge in examining her other contributions.
If only we knew where this tent was.
The board is not required to seek opinions or place issues up for a vote to the entire community. It is their responsibility to make decisions and move issues forward. If they are not doing so, then the board may not be living up to their fiduciary duty.
A journey writer's main interest is going to be - generally - how the characters get there from here, whereas a destination writer is more interested in where they're going. I don't intend to stigmatise destination writers at all, but I am - as you may have guessed - a journey writer myself. I find it very difficult to get through the middle of a book unless I know where I'm headed; I tend to lose interest, or flail around as directionlessly as my characters. The rest of this blog is going to be of very little interest to destination writers, I'm afraid.
"Florida Snow" is a new tape of City Center jams that have come up this winter. Two songs you may have checked out on this blog, as well as a reworking of the older song "Stones", as well as some icy drones, weirdly indie-rockish moments and other odd, cold sounds. There's 50 copies made, available at the same time as new tapes by Settle (a collab between me and Rob Theakston from Lexington KY) and the debut tape from Damned Dogs (glittery noise from Amber & me, not much like Swimsuit at all.) More information is available here.
But God, after destroying humanity just a couple of generations ago, had said:
A small, individual-sized fluffy cake that is baked in a cupcake or muffin pan. The cupcake mold can be lined with a crimped paper or foil cup, or greased and then the cupcake removed from the mold. It is then frosted and, if desired, decorated. Before eating, the paper or foil is simply peeled off. A cupcake canbe served on a plate and eaten with a fork, but most of the time the best way to savor a cupcake is to just break it apart and pop it in your mouth.
They had a whole bar station dedicated simply to Sushi. My gosh there was so much Sushi. Your typical Sushi was created then a whole bunch of others I have never seen before. There was Tempura, Avocado, Phildelphia and more, the list was long so maybe you need to see for yourself....
Ha! I was a definite contrarian. I frequently got Penance Hall, even once garnering a coveted *indefinite* Penance Hall sentence for a transgression. However, I was only suspended once, and that was because my entire homeroom was suspended. You're a captive audience, so I'll tell you the story. Endure!
I am sorry that this picture doesn't do the dish justice either. We have had many rainy and overcast days, and since we only have one window (glass door) it was difficult getting any good photos. Rest assured though, I am sure to make this again, and next time I will be putting my own spin on things.
The Arc Angels+
These expectations helped me in some ways, I suppose; they provided a clear picture of what things might be like, freeing my mind from needing to obsess over the various ways things might turn out for me. But they also provided a barrier, at once deep and tall, that I spent many years attempting to overcome. Over time, as the notions of what “could be” took root in my mind and in my heart, these expectations transformed my ideas of what “could be” into commitments to what “must be.” And “must be”s, of course, are highly dangerous. They restrict our ability to learn from our experiences because we already think we know the best path. They lead us to feel trapped, unable to alter destinies or even circumstances because we cannot see beyond them. They rob us of being able to see the possible because we already believe we know the probable. Simply put, they put blinders on us that limit our ability to see any further than whatever construct we have become comfortable with.
The initials “B.I.” in that journal entry stood for Obama’s employer, Business International, located at 1 Dag Hammarskjöld Plaza, on Second Avenue between 47th and 48th Streets. Business International had been operating for nearly 30 years by the time Obama went to work there. Established in 1954, its stated goal was “to advance profitable corporate and economic growth in socially desirable ways.” What that entailed, for the most part, was compiling and constantly updating newsletters and reference materials for corporations that did business around the world. Obama was a very junior employee, doing research and writing reports.
Ask someone to write down all the differences between China and rural Georgia and his hand will fall off before he’s halfway done. So let us restrict ourselves to the vista: cranes, skyscrapers, spanking new rail networks and smog: China. …
This week we had a baby shower for a co-worker, who is expecting a sweet, baby girl.
As citizens we need to begin to share in the wealth that we have created in this country. What we do not need is yet another tyrannical administration trying to exterminate the public in every conceivable way, while this government pursues its own Global-Agenda that seeks the total destruction of everyone here who is no longer valuable to the powers that have declared themselves to be above all the laws, of both man and the universe.
So how is this view possible given that we just saw a high in April after a huge 6 month uptrend? Doesn’t that go against the data above? To a degree. At this point the high came on the first trading day of the month and today was only April 10th and the S&P 500 has already fallen from 1422 to 1357. If we get a bottom by the end of April or the very beginning of May my data suggests that one should go with the signal from the latter. In that case it would suggest that the signal from late-April or even early-May could be a major low. Given my timing cycles looking for turns in April 2012 and July 2012 this could work. April 2012 could end up being a high and a low (this happened with my July 2011 and October 2011 cycles as well) and July could very well be the retest of that low. I would then be looking for the market to break above 1422 in August/September if this does indeed play out like 2006. My next timing cycles are January 2013, April 2013, and October 2013. Given that I believe this bull market is in its latter stages I tend to believe that January or April will provide the initial bull market high and April or October will be the secondary high. This would fit in quite well with the highs of 2000 and 2007. Remember that topping is a process and bottoming is an event.
Along with the new year came a radical change to one of my favorite blogs, Get Off The Coast. Due to it no longer being just the work of Jheri, Get Off The Coast morphed into Secret Decoder to better represent the sprawling music obsessed collective it had become. Along with the name/site change came the even better news that Secret Decoder would also exist as a physical, magazine supplement filled with deeper, richer articles about all the bands and record labels that Secret Decoder/Get Off The Coast had been digging up and rapid blogging about for years. Secret Decoder is currently producing its first issue, and has set up a Kickstarter page to help with the funding. I need not say how worth while and deserving this project is, and every dollar helps. Speaking of, any dollar donated to the project gets one a digital copy of Decoders' first mixtape (streamable below), which also serves as the perfect sampler for what's to the come/be covered within the first issue.
My editor asked great questions that made me think beyond the chronological details of Bill’s life. She encouraged me to explore the question as to why Bill Traylor began to draw. She offered many suggestions, always leaving the final decision to me.
I am thrilled and blessed beyond measure to have shared the past sixteen years with such a beautiful, compassionate, creative, aware, funny, thoughtful, empathetic, amazing boy. He has made my life rich beyond compare.
Option #5: ??? What do you suggest?
My frustration, which I'm sure is apparent in this post, comes because as an unschooling advocate, I deal with people's lack of understanding about unschooling all the time, and that lack of understanding is exacerbated by the sheer amount of people using the unschooling term without really embracing the principles of unschooling.
Back in August, our local Bass Pro Shops was running a pre-hunting season sale with a few low priced loss leaders. What struck my eye was a Savage 64F rifle, a semi-automatic, magazine loaded .22 rifle for $110. The ad had the magic phrases "Limited Quantities" and "One Day Only" to further peak my interest. As part of our continuing training, Mrs. Graybeard and I are trying to arrange for an Appleseed weekend, so we need a couple of good .22s. While you can bring any kind of rifle, for the two of us to bring anything bigger than a .22 has a serious cost disadvantage. We only have one AR (at the moment) and even then, the thought of running through 500 rounds each at 35 or 40 cents per round vs. 4 cents a round makes the .22 that much more attractive. My limited talks with folks who have done an Appleseed event says that most people bring Ruger 10/22s.
Thanks to Owen, we learned the fate of someone long since forgotten:
I gathered the fabric flowers in the center and placed a small white flower on top before assembling with the brad.
I lost about a kilo and a half last week!
I sliped away last night
We also went to western restaurants. The first evening we went to a pizza place called “High Fly”. Their pizzas are also better then anything we can get in our city.
Happy Tuesday everyone! Today for Bootcamp we are going to do a second chat session on Twitter. I see on our assignment that I am to be one of the team members leading the conversation and the topic is going to be about keeping business records in order.
when we arrived home, little isaac sat on the carpet in the living room and looked around for several seconds before moving in any direction. he reached out to feel the carpet slowly, almost as if to test it. it was the funniest thing. it was like he was re-orienting himself to his old surroundings after having spent a week sitting, standing and cruising on sand, sidewalks or the shiny terra-cotta-colored tiles of my in-laws' condo. he scanned the room, and when it was all alright in his mind again, he was off to play with his old toys... toys that must have seemed like distant memories to one so small after being away that long.
He managed to turn on his old ally the governor, scrubbing City Hall of any Smith loyalists, granting more jobs to his type of Tammany men, filling their own pockets but allied to the charming man in charge.
Many women do noble things,
So successful were the design concepts that they were adopted by the South Africans who built a range of specialist vehicles. The one above is the RG-31, issued to US forces in Iraq - the photograph was published in a British newspaper in June 2006, illustrating the value of a mine protected vehicle, from which the crew had emerged with only very slight injuries.
We recently had a chance to test this when we had overnight guests whom Livi had never met before. Initially, she kept her distance and even cried because she was a bit scared in the beginning, which apparently is not unusual for high need babies. Eventually, however, she did interact and play with our guests as long as one of us was by her side.
we were having. It was stressful.
The Hunterfly Road Houses of Weeksville are the discovered remnants of a free African-American enclave of urban trasdespeople and property owners. The community provided safety for fugitive slaves and those later fleeing the Civil War draft riots of lower Manhattan. By the time of the Emancipation Proclamation, Weeksville was a thriving area with its own doctors, teachers, publishers, and social services.
Long before his iconic acting career, which includes roles in “Taxi” and “Who’s The Boss,” Tony Danza received a degree in History Education. During the 2009-2010 school year, he took on his most challenging and rewarding role yet as he stepped into the classroom as a full-time teacher at Philadelphia’s Northeast High School . “Teach: Tony Danza” follows the first year-teacher as he instructs a 10th-grade English class with 26 students in back-to-back 45-minute periods.
FAIL – The service at my local MAC counter. I’m sure I just got them on an off day and yes it was busy but I popped in to back to MAC some things and it just did not go down well. I wanted to pick up a bottle of their cleanse off oil too but the girl just thrust the lipstick at me and walked off without asking if I wanted anything else. The whole experience was about as pleasant and friendly as erm.... an unpleasant unfriendly thing.
For The Second Reproduction, the percentage calculation I used before was inaccurate at best, as Nscripter’s script is basically one big text script with all the codes in it. So the script we split out differs in size as some have more code than the other. So I decided not to put some estimate numbers. The game isn’t that big, but the main reason for the editing by Sheeta to be taking awhile is because this is just her side project (obviously main is whatever Ammy’s doing), and a extremely perfectionist approach to the text written which takes at least as much effort/time as translating the whole thing, meaning you probably wouldn’t be able to see a single trace of my writing on it (lol).
There have been giveaways, contests and reviews. We have started a great club in the Sunflower girls, where we have camped, partied, gone on tour.
Céline: You know, it’s being around you…
By the thousands, these tank-sized cabs would roam up and down the avenues, looking great, burning gas and picking up passengers. Once inside, you were met with the cavernous back seat. It made you feel like you were driving in your living room. Or more often than anyone needs to think about, bedroom.
My first baby photo shoot. Actually my first photo shoot in general. I am a habitual picture taker. I've loved taking pictures since childhood. Although the thought of taking pictures professionally has crossed my mind, I feel way too intimidated by it. It's a hard field to break into, with so many talented people out there. Nevertheless, I still love taking my own pictures.
Having at first been relieved that two chicks had made it through the night, our concern switched to the continued absence of the adult male. None of the people commenting via the blog or the Wildlife Trust’s Twitter/Facebook pages had seen the male and the camera team at NTU trawled through hours of footage with no sign of him.
Hi guys. As some of you might know, I was born and raised in Romania. Now, my country has a rich folklore when it comes to things that can go bump in the night. But I chose to write about witches, as opposed to vampires, faeries, strigoi, and so on. So why witches? Well, for starters, I wanted to write about someone alive. Someone whom I could put in the middle of an ordinary setting. Give her a life, a family, friends. Make her likable. (So I would've struggled to write a vampire that could fit this particular bill). On the other hand, in Romania, witches are quite notorious characters. People fear them. People seek their services. Counsel. Advice (and yes, they pay for it). Witches walk in both worlds - they're human, but they have extraordinary powers. They can bring on or get rid of sickness. They can make or break a couple. They can tell fortunes. And they can cast the most horrific curses that live on for generations. Personally, I never met one of these illustrious women (because they're always women), but I grew up listening to these stories and, of course, I was always fascinated. A witch was like Wonder Woman-meets The Halliwell sisters-meets Milla Jovovich in Resident Evil. Amazingly powerful. Cunning. Unstoppable. So, as a little girl (a very dorky little girl), I spent my fair share of time thinking about witches.
I have quite a bit of will power.
Saying that though once i got it right i loved the effect and it has to be said that it really does make an immediate noticeable difference to lines and pores. Without a doubt.
Here are some other ideas I came up with:
I can now see that a big downfall of mine is my negative thinking. My negative thinking connects to my anxiety, which I think stops me from achieving what I want to. I feel that it also creates a negative aura around me that others can sense.
I started by measuring the doll from the waist down to where I wanted the tutu to fall on her legs. My tulle strips were cut (and not precisely) to about 5" long. I had lots leftover from my Fancy Bird Nest, so I just started cutting on that. It takes lots of strips, so just keep cutting. :)
So I didn’t actually come up with this concoction on my own. I got the idea from the Vittles and Bits blog but used a different brownie recipe. The caramel recipe comes from the Pioneer Woman but using the adaptation from Vittles and Bits. These are the type of brownies you make when you’re week is rapidly going down hill, you’ve had a super long day at work and the kids whined and cried for 3 hours during dinner and bath time. They are finally in bed, and you and the brownies have a date with the couch and some netflix. Or, you just love chocolate, caramel and are perfectly content eating these for breakfast with a good cup of coffee.
“My father is a police officer. He solved many criminal cases, including murders. I like listening to him telling me thrilling and exciting stories about how to find suspects by clues. I know what he and his colleagues did was very dangerous and asked for great courage, so I am very proud of him…I had an interest in journalism partly because of what I got form my father, that is, faith in truth. I want to show truth to people.”
Course Instructor: Vincent T Joachim
When people hear about the ARC of the Covenant, they tend to think about it in a religious context.
Luke 2:13-14
There's no chance that we'll exhaust the library's offerings during our time here, and the number of books on my "to read" list keeps growing. Just added: anything by new Nobel laureate J.M.G. Le Clézio which I noticed on display (in English translation) when I was in the checkout line last weekend. I just have to finish the books already piled up on my nightstand plus four or five back issues of The New Yorker before I can take that on.
To go from someone totally obsessed with alcohol, drinking every day - usually until drunk - for 15 years to someone who doesn’t think about alcohol at all, has no desire to drink and who leaves half a glass of wine after attending an event, is astounding.
The first one is Billy's Brew and Que. While Billy Forrester of Waterloo, Showdown, Dog and Duck and Billy's on Burnet does not have anything to do with it, Ol' Waterloo brewer Steve Anderson is supposedly helping out. I think his Assistant at Waterloo will be the brewer. I had to do some digging, but it will be located on Barton Springs right next to Zilker Park. Sure hope they fare better than the 14 other places that have opened and closed there. Should be a great place to take a break at ACL Fest next year.
### D Scene 21 Mar 2012
for all those still in harms way to return safely home.
Blake Shelton isn't one of my favourite artists, but he's done a couple of things I quite like. I'm not keen on his sentimental radio friendly tack like the massive hit, Austin but like his ballsier stuff like Playboys of the Southwestern World, Hillbilly Bone and The More I Drink. For some reason I'm a sucker for the flag waving, redneck anthems country songs and I think it's fair to classify Kiss My Country Ass as such. The song was released as part of last year's EP Hillbilly Bone and went to number 2 on the country charts. The song was written by Rhett Atkins (who released a version himself), Dallas Davidson and Jon Stone.
In the meantime, Chicago has cycling signage around the city, dedicated cycling lanes and some great recreational paths.
So Dick Clark became a “name” in American rock ’n’ roll by doing what was surely the cheapest fucking music show to ever air on a major network. Early on, when I was just a kid discovering the music of the Fifties through my mother, she distinguished for me between shows that had the performers playing live and the Dick Clark approach, which was pretty much ALWAYS (outside of his imitation Grammies, the American Music Awards) people lip-synching to their records — even if said records were several years (or
Now who in their right mind would be foolish enough to do that? I suspect that here Kipling is referring to the fact that in life sometimes we must take a stand on principle and that often involves a threat to our material well-being and sometimes even more than that.
Chop celery and onion.
BreathSavers 3-hour or Ice Breakers 1.09-1.5oz
Now, of course, I'm right back to where I was when I left; obsessing about every tiny bit of minutia I can get from my various news sources. This is so sad, y'all. This has been my approximate media schedule for the past several weeks:
the essays which Parmar places at the end of the book often find Mirrlees both brooding over the past and postulating why she is so drawn to do so – in ‘The Religion of Women’ she concludes that, more than men, “women are the slaves of Time” through being more physically attuned to seasonal cycles. Yet her memories are not necessarily regretful ones: ‘An Earthly Paradise’ is a lively, witty recounting of part of her time in Paris with Jane Harrison and affords a
Obviously, the sheriff had not thought so since he’d never asked to speak to Morris. But, that wasn’t entirely unusual because Morris had been strange way before the dementia set in. Holding a conversation with him had always been like talking to a person with half the bricks shy of a full load.
There is a danger in casting too broad and long a shadow: those who grow up in your shadow may take it as the normal level of illumination. And in a way, I guess this shows you just can’t win. Write something ephemeral, and you disappear; but, write something iconic enough to influence all that follows after, and you may find yourself blending into the furniture.
Osama bin Laden is dead.
I wanted both Harry and Travis to be wholly viable options -- one represents a calm stability, a very comfortable life, and the other represents a more reckless passion and uncertainty. It’s then up to Mary to decide who she is: is she someone who wants a calm and comfortable life or is she someone who would embrace passion even if it potentially comes with great risks? Once she figures out who she is, it’s easy for her to figure out which love interest bets fits with that part of her.
Once acne has occurred, Zinc is extremely important due to it being involved in healing tissue and preventing scarring. Those nasty acne scars that result from acne can be healed and prevented when proper amounts of Zinc are present in the body. Acne causes numerous problems and damages the skin in many ways and Zinc helps to heal this damage and keep the scarring to a minimal level.
We want to know where we end and the world begins. We want to know where that line is. It's the deepest problem of epistemology. (37) Another thing I learn from following Morris' process is his method of interviewing people. When he talks with a forensic photography specialist who mentions the "CSI effect" and says "I'm sure you know what that is," Morris doesn't say "Oh, yeah of course I do. Haven't you seen my films?" He just responds, "Tell me." By suppressing his ego Morris gets more information.
But that wasn't the only traffic advice he had. No sir, it wasn't.
What made you happy this week? Please share in the comments!
I’m Dramatic – I over-dramatize everything, my stories, my wardrobe, if my coffee is made incorrectly? – but she stands by everything I say, even if she is embarrassed.
- 1/2 teaspoon of apple pie spice
London – San Diego – San Francisco – London – Atlanta – St. Louis in 4 days. Subtracting travel time, That gives you about 3 days total to be awake and doing stuff. Lecturing university students, visiting robot competitions, making music in the studio, visiting clubs, visiting the places he once preformed at, and who knows what else more, are all of the things Will.i.am did in 4 days. Why does he do all these things? No one is making him, it’s his drive and motivation to do what he loves. He wants to push education so he gives lectures and inspiration to young people. He attends robot competitions to promote kids to learn about science and technology, so the future will be filled with smart people that want to change the world.
Now, back to the mantel. Do you remember the silver teapot and sugar bowl that belonged to Grandma's "Granny"? Those books are from the late 1940s and you've seen the picture of my dad playing the piano when he was a teenager. The silver bowl on the right has been hiding in the cupboard for years. It is engraved with my name and "Outstanding Business Student" 1981-82 (my senior year of high school.) By the way, does it really look like that wreath is held up by duct tape? Both your dad and Kellie asked on two separate occasions! Duct tape? Really? It's silver ribbon for heaven's sake!
My stomach growled and I stared at it. “Be quiet.” I mumbled and turned my attention back to the water, spotting a couple of sailboats gliding through from shore.
You can find this hardcover book many places on line, priced anywhere from $9.32 to $15.
In conformity with the Algerian practice, he advocated that "traitors and informers" have their noses cut off. At the end of the protracted Rivonia proceedings, Mandela made a 4H -hour address from the dock, ever since hailed as one of the great political testaments of the 20th century: and a major plank on which his formidable reputation was founded. But, contrary to the propaganda, it was neither spontaneous nor all his own work.
Happy Saturday, friends! I hope everyone has recovered from their food coma, and are enjoying the weekend. In between hauling out the Christmas decor and browsing for online deals, I've racked up quite a few bookmarks of fabulous projects to share! Check them out on your next hot chocolate break.
Chair of the judges Michelle Berriedale-Johnson said: “For years dairy free and vegan manufacturers have struggled to make a really tasty ‘cheese’ substitute but they have never been able to crack it. Which makes Vegusto’s achievement so exciting.”
Dido
16 ounces Cool-Whip
This requires from scholar to travel many thousands of kilometers; learn number of languages; visit remote rural regions where rituals and customs of Slavic religion still survive in their full continuity and in spite of Christianity and Islam; to compare folklore of different Slavic people (since not all of them saved the same pieces of Slavic religion); to study folk songs and try to decipher them; setting hypothesis based on what one knows and testing them against the customs and beliefs still practiced, written sources and material evidence provided by archaeology - a proper scientific approach. However, it’s far easier to sit in the comfort of your home and copy-paste what others wrote before you being aware that is the way for your career to advance and not to stir the water.
“Yeah. He sent me a text message earlier today.”
I can deal with it-- I don't want to, but I can.
Amazing creative, shit results = client blames agency, agency loses.
The woman, 25, told police Terrell swore at her and said, "I'll throw you off the balcony and say you jumped," according to court records.
That changes your entire perception of the character. Now you know why she was so rude to her boyfriend. Now you understand why she'd rather get fired than take shit from her manager. But if you disengaged and stopped reading because you didn't like her, you'd just think that Morgan is an angry drama llama who's mad at life for no apparent reason.
Burt Wilson: Well, it ain't workin' now, Frank!
There are a goodly number who consider this jumped up little upstart unfit to run a whelk stall never mind an office of state. And if you want further provocation to reach for the sick-bag go read the depressing account penned by that "friend of the right wing" Rod Liddle in the Current Issue of The Spectator. Liddle frets that there is no-one of any "quality or gravitas" in the Labour Party to take over when the inevitable happens and Brown is toppled.
It is the perfect gift this Holiday Season. You may find that you must treat yourself to this little gift as well.
Right over to WOYWW.....
BROOKLYN, N.Y.—Starting today, I have three days this weekend, rather than the usual two, to catch up on films, socialize (I hope) and just generally enjoy life outside of my day job. I already have my Saturday set, for the most part: The newly designed Museum of the Moving Image in Queens is re-opening tomorrow, and among the films being screened on its first day jumping back into New York cultural life? Jacques Tati's Playtime and Stanley Kubrick's 2001: A Space Odyssey—both in 70mm! I will be seeing both, even though, honestly, Playtime—one of my five favorite films of all time, even though, up 'til now, I've only seen it on tube and widescreen TVs via DVD—is the one I'm more excited to see in its original format. (I admire 2001 a great deal, don't get me wrong...but it's probably my third favorite Kubrick film overall, behind Barry Lyndon and Dr. Strangelove. Of course, I don't discount the possibility that may well change tomorrow, seeing it on what I hope is a laaaaarge screen.) Also planned for this weekend: the new 35mm print of Sergei Eisenstein's Battleship Potemkin at Film Forum—a classic of the cinema which, to my shame, I have not yet seen; and catching up with one or two of the newer releases. Somewhere within all that moviegoing will be a stage performance and, I hope, a TV on which to watch the Jets take on the Patriots Sunday afternoon.
When we got downstairs, the pub was packed. "Too late," I thought, "we've lost our table". Sitting at 'our' table and all those in the vicinity of the small room by the fire and the three Irish musicians playing were, oh, twenty-four or so wild Irish men in town for a stag party. "No worries," the barmaid declared, "they'll be moving along in an hour's time." When we saw her deliver another round and another, we conceded defeat and chose alternate seating. Or should I say standing? I stood in a doorway, peering in and watching as the night's events unfolded.
Fried rice and egg drop corn soup was always my mom’s idea of a “lazy” meal. She had strict dinner table etiquette and she wouldn’t allow us to eat in front of the television. However, whenever we had these “lazy” days, we would eat at the coffee table and watch a movie or T.V. show. My brother, sister, and I would get so rowdy in front of the television. We’d sit for hours just eating and chatting away as we watched our cartoons. My mom would be on the side nagging about how messy we were eating and how she should never allow us to eat in front of the television again, but I know she secretly enjoyed spending that time with us. I tried to recreate that moment this past weekend when my sister came home for her spring break. We opted for Pawn Stars on TV rather than cartoons this time around but we were just as rowdy as we were back then.
Why Spanish Tiles Always Work
Many other agricultural, energy, and metals commodities have also had large price hikes, albeit below that threshold (for the 25 commodities typically included in the indexes, the average price rise since 2003 has been 203 percent). There is no evidence of any other commodities price boom to match the current one in terms of scope.”
His cases packed and sent:
it never really stays in a peaceful state of completeness for long.
For 1 month of advertisement: $6
Well, I will close for now, maybe I will have more to share later. We'll see. I am not always the best, my heart has the best intentions though.
Was Paul beginning to doubt the truth of God? We don’t want to think so but it seems so. It was the divine voice that said, “Stop being afraid.” The flesh would say, “Do you really think you can get out of this alive?”
Proportional representation
Ok...I know winter is a looooooooong time away.. (well in michigan like 3 months...haha) And I've always wanted a sexy peacoat!!! I have al these granny ones :'(....and i refuse to have another granny one!! lol
compression processes that lead to a seamless DWT is that there is no support
As I briefly pondered if it was a wise choice to blow $40 on a book when I’m trying so hard to go paperless at home, I realized the tome was a little piece of inspiration to take home with me and representative of not just what I love about books, but what I love about the Met. Just as the Brothers Grimm discovered, there truly are stories all around us – some from the past, some of the moment and some to be created, but they are there for us to explore… or escape in — if we open ourselves up to them. Perhaps, beyond ancient scrolls and priceless works of art, this concept was the real takeaway from our day at the Met: go there and let your imagination take you wherever you want to go; clearly a lesson not just for a fifth grader.
*Note: If you don’t know what NaNoWriMo is and you haven’t Googled it already, do so now.
As soon as the threat was over and the feeling came back to my feet we got out and I was either talking to my mom or Levi on the phone making sure the threat was completely over. Then I heard it. The cry that trumps all other cries. You know it. The cry that indicates there is blood or broken bones or dark purple bruises. This time it was blood. Lots and lots of it.
Red Dons on this recording is:
They’re presence
Distress Inks (I used Mustard Seed, Broken China, Iced Spruce)
You’re reading the last post from brewblog.com. If you’ve come to rely on this blog to contribute to your perspective on the beer industry, rest assured that MillerCoors will still do that. But we are a new company, and it’s time to move on to new and different ways of communicating.
“So there is a Hell?” asked Chris.
Can all five readers be right? I think it's impossible for any of them to be wrong, as it happens. When a reader gives you their response to something, you have to accept it - they can't be wrong about their response. But what the example shows is that you can't please all of the people all of the time. I am in the process of going through the book again looking for obnoxiously long passages of dialogue and blank rooms, but I'm not looking very hard - I've more than satisfied 80% of my readers so far (statistics are fun, aren't they?), so it can't be that bad.
GRAND MASTER
The Liberation Through Hearing During the Intermediate State also mentions three other Bardo: those of "life" (or ordinary waking consciousness), of "Dhyana" (meditation), and of "dream" (the dream state during normal sleep).
relations with Somalia, but retiterated the hostile actions taken by the CIC previously mentioned by the Prime Minister. It highlighted the "clear and present danger" the CIC represented to Ethiopian sovereignty and expressed Parliament’s support for the GOE in taking "all measures deemed necessary" to deal with the threat.
And what about the skin? Because the skin contains fats, canned salmon with skin will have a higher omega 3 count than skinless. I hate the slimy skin, but love the bones and want to make sure that the fat adjacent to the skin is included. Thus, I opt for the traditional salmon with skin, doctor it myself and increase my portions a tad.
Part of me secretly didn't care how they survived the brutal chopping. If they died then at least I could plant what I wanted to plant- at least that is my logic.
Surgeons were not medical doctors and were not well respected in those days, with community standings little higher than those of butchers. Indeed, the principal occupation of Surgeons in rural farming communities was the removal of fingers, toes and limbs due to dangers inherent in the rough agricultural life the people led.
I know it's tough to get scammed. You feel violated, you really do. But if you don't report what happened, due to embarrassment, the scammer will blithely go along, scamming other victims. If you report them, and post what happened to you, you'll be able to hurt them back, at least a little.
Okay, now back to the meat pot…
You can get more than one Children’s Week pet each year.
GLORIA MINDOCK is editor of Cervena Barva Press and The Istanbul Literary Review. Her poetry has been translated into Romanian, Serbian, Spanish, and French. Widely published, her poetry recently has appeared in Levure Litteraire (France) and in Vatra Veche Romania).
- The font size of STATE OF HAWAII differs from the font size of its companion DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH header.
** I also embossed my cloud stickers to give them more texture. Rub the embossing ink over the surface, sprinkle with Wow Opaque Bright White powder and heat set.
This past month I’ve been catching up with some old friends. A couple of weeks ago college friends came to stay. I had lunch today with an old friend and a little while ago I ran into a high school friend at Wal-Mart (yes folks, the convenience of Wal-Mart – get your groceries, underwear, automotive needs and have impromptu reunions all under one roof). It’s been great!
This semester, 155 students there are taking American Sign Language, about three times the enrollment in spring 2005.
Jacob Kearey-Moreland called on people to rearrange their priorities to focus on human need instead of corporate greed.
It’s Not About Me
2. Sweet Mary (White, Argent) 4:05
This being the guiding principle, the AG turned to verify whether such provisions had been adopted at EU or national level.
In that person’s eyes.
Killian’s First Cold
” Uncle, do you think that they will fire the tear gas?”
Fire directly at the people present.. one Rakyat even mentioned that one of the PDRM thugs aimed one canister directly at Nurul Izzah.
Joy's Life Stamps donated by Abby
My sentiment was printed with a computer font and I think it's a perfect way to say "get well" without saying ...... well, you get the idea!
The staple of all summer collections is always the bronzer. The Luminous Bronzing Powder is available in two colour ways of either pink or peach based tones. It contains seven silk textured tones within each palette. I am still using a similar product from last years summer launch.
BLITZER: Thank you, Governor.
“Ol’ Dirty Bastard is dead,” I said. As of this writing, he’s been dead for over seven years.
Thanks for this opportunity Paul.
Do you keep a pen and notepad on your bedside table?
January 23, 2011 (AP is roughly 4 months. Since she is the youngest and I am constantly in denial about her growing up, we didn't even put her in the jump up till now... not that she's anywhere big enough now, but we did wait another month.)
unaware that she
But above and beyond all those things, I miss him no matter what I’m doing. When putting on moisturizer on in the dark getting ready for bed, I remember how that’s how I do it at times when Chase is home. Because he’s already laying down for bed and I don’t want to turn on a light and disturb him. Then I want to be able to look over at him lying in the bed and say something, or do something to get his attention. But he’s not there. Folding clothes I can picture him helping me, and I think of what I’d do if he was there. As I’m finishing getting the kids ready for church I can almost see him at the sink taking care of the breakfast dishes, and I want to flash him a smile and let him know that I appreciate him. Watching tv, I think of the analysis I’d be giving him. At the store, I see movies I think he’d like and I imagine watching them with him.
These people are effectively made into indentured servants, or even slaves; and their masters take the "masters privilege".
So we spotted things.
Hi all! I wanted to post a project I actually made almost 2 months ago. We were having family photos done at the end of October and I wanted something special for our Christmas photo. I really wanted a banner that we could hold in the picture that said "Merry Christmas". Well, as the week before our photos went on I still hadn't gotten the banner done. I hemed and hawed over making this banner Friday night and then into Saturday morning (our pictures were Saturday afternoon). After finally deciding that I NEEDED this banner (LOL) I made it in literally 30 min. I put it all together on my gypsy and cut it out. I made it very simple so that it wasn't too distracting from our photos. After we were done with our photos I decided that I would keep it and hang it up for Christmas:-) Here it is.
One of the pubs that specially took my breath out is… the Unicorn! I wonder if the owner’s name is Charlie.
I'm at a point where I'm asking you to help me. You see I'm committed to being one of those dreamers who do things that matter. I've been accepted to an internship in Belize, which will give me the chance to learn and grow, not only as a Christian, but as someone who cares about our world and our city. I know there are others out there with these same cares. I've seen you and I've met you, and you're what makes this city what it is.
Spoon mixture into a piping bag and pip it into rounds on a prepare baking sheet (on parchment paper).
My wish is that I will get the opportunity in life to make my dreams a reality. I’m not sure if I’m just procrastinating about it or being wise about making sure I sort out life’s little issues first? I certainly have the drive, desire, ambition and common sense to make my dreams reality.
The dude who bestowed upon the Weihenstephaner brewery the right to sell beer was none other than the King of the day, Wenceslas. As in ‘Good King Wenceslas’. As in ‘Good King Wenceslas looked out, on the Feast of Stephen’ – you know, the Christmas Carol? When he was looking out he was probably downing a large glass of Hefe Weissbier or maybe a Bayerisch Tradition or even a hoppy Pilsner*. Next Christmas when the kids start singing that one, smile knowingly and raise a glass to the church song about beer. Cool.
procedure to hopefully fix it,
To keep his eyes and mouth closed
72 North Almaden Avenue San Jose, CA 95110
* BE CAREFUL NOT TO INCLUDE SPOILERS! (make sure that what you share doesn’t give too much away! You don’t want to ruin the book for others!)
‘Social services go to such lengths to check those who foster and adopt. They check your friends, your family members, even your pets, but when it suits them they will ask you to take a huge risk with someone about whom they know nothing.’
Sands book is to be launched today in Italy Claudy report ‘to be released next month’ Controversial report receives little support Asda’s double killer employee: Why did he get his job back? Alleged UVF boss is denied bail on pipe-bomb charge Police Ombudsman to investigate Derry bomb warning
I'm feeling productive and a better balance of home and work, so far so good.
It was for this final reason that they demanded the death of Jesus Christ for he made Himself equal with God, and also spoke against the temple (a fabrication) and they also thought that He had broken the Sabbath. But what of Paul? Going back to Acts 21:28, they also wrongly accused him of polluting or blaspheming the temple, their holy place. How could the chief captain judge in such circumstances? He knew nothing of the law of the Jews.
I love reading about life and romance in the Rockies and these books are centered around a bead shop. They are easy reads, page turners and Thayne crafted a community I would love to be a part of. Both books I downloaded on my Kindle app for my iPhone from Amazon.com and I didn't wake my hubby up while sleepless in BA. Book III will be out in October (2012), and I can't wait! I hope Thayne keeps writing this series!
The emptiness was filled. A new beginning…Once again,
RECOMMENDATION: Worth seeing, but not a top tier comedy.
of the budget is set aside for
On December 31st, 2011, while everyone was busy ringing in the New Year, Barack Obama quietly signed into law a piece of legislation far more draconian than anything offered up by the Bush administration. The National Defense Authorization Act of 2012, which outlined the budget for U.S. defense expenditures at home and abroad, includes a notable section (1021) under the heading of “Counterterrorism” which allows for the indefinite detention of American citizens suspected of aiding and abetting terrorist activities, without trial.
The answer is, mostly, yes. While it doesn’t resonate quite as well as Ray of Light or even Confessions on a Dancefloor, MDNA certainly works both as a decent Madonna album and as a piece of dance-pop fair. Madonna isn’t stupid; she knows what her fans want and incorporates that into what she wants. And she wants to dance again.
Although before we get there, I do have to ask a few questions that are already bothering me about this particular prompt.
The hill in my own way
One entry per person please!
Being it's my work, I'll just copy/paste what I said. Because I can. Because it's mine.
It happened again yesterday after I'd dropped off some dry cleaning and as a result I decided to unplug the iPod and reset it, just to see what would happen.
It got sanded with a palm sander next (stuff sanding it by hand!) and a coat of primer , in a spray can.
A goal I encourage for both my clients and myself is to strive for a place where mind and body are reciprocally committed to wellbeing. Once attained, we no longer need to wonder whether we can or cannot complete a routine. All we must do is listen to the internal, audible difference between the mind saying no, and the body saying ‘injury!’
1/4 cup coarsely chopped pecans, toasted
that our kids will never know the same wise and Godly woman that I knew,
by Vivian Arend
More to the point, can someone say that “Jesus is Lord” but not acknowledge that He is God? I don’t believe so.
The writing. Oh, the writing. I enjoy reading Stan Cattermole’s writing as much as I enjoy Mark Twain and Charles Dickens and Kurt Vonnegut. In fact, I have rarely read anything more painfully humorous and delightfully moving. For me, this book is packed full of snivels and dusted with scenes that require tissues and a break. And yet the same book contains wondrous interludes that make me laugh out loud, even on third or fourth reading.
Balance!
What a remarkable testimony John gives us. John (the disciple) implies that John (the prophet) had never seen Jesus, or at least had seen him on so few occasions that he would not have been able to recognize him by his features. But he knew him by the miraculous event that occurred as Jesus came for John to baptize him that day. God’s spirit came and rested on him! It reminds me of the promise God made to Simeon and Anna priest and prophetess in the temple. Both knew they would not die before they saw the Messiah. When Mary and Joseph brought Jesus to the temple for his consecration, both recognized him immediately as the Messiah. There was something about him. God’s Spirit rested on him, his glory shown on him, he was God incarnate. John didn’t know him by his physical features, but by the divine nature he exuded. The spirit that rested on him. John knew him because God was with him and in him, he was God’s son, he was God.
1 tablespoon Italian Seasoning (I got it at Costco... it just has basil, oregano, etc... mixed together)
In fact, when I came to find time to read the book I discovered that the story of Concetta, Tancredi and Angelica is an aspect and consequence of a much wider story, that of the ways, both politically and psychologically, Prince Salina handles or fails to handle the social changes taking place around him.
In a small saucepan combine sugar, corn syrup, and butter or margarine. Cook over medium heat, stirring constantly, until butter or margarine melts and sugar dissolves. Cool slightly.
The way we checked to make sure that everyone was playing fairly was by knowing how many balls we passed out at the beginning of each round (5 per player), and then counting how many were turned in at the end of each round (5 for each player that played in the round). The problem was, we handed out, like 35 balls, and then people only turned in around 17. Then, in the second round, we handed out 30 balls (because we only did a single elimination – oops!), and people only turned in five! FIVE!
Although the day started frosty, this had disappeared by the time we set out, and we hadn’t imagined it would be so muddy. We had a pleasant enough walk but it was cut short by our inappropriate clothing for the conditions. We will return and this time reach our destination-the long barrow!
PLACE: MacEwan Conference and Event Centre, University of Calgary, Canada
Last spring I brought some sunflower seeds to work for the cardinal that sits in the trees and sings every morning as i walk into work. It's such a wonderful sound after the cols winter that i wanted to give him some nourishment to thank him.
The Dirty Dozen Brass Band - Mardi gras in New Orleans
VG: Yes. And in the end, I think that would have been to lay ourselves open to criticism. The job of the writer, as I see it, is not to be didactic, but rather it is to lay the topic in front of the reader in an engaging and original way - to draw the reader in so they can explore their own views alongside the situation portrayed. Besides, a state of affairs that has developed over centuries can’t be genuinely swept away in five minutes.
"Exactly. And our wise Father in heaven knows when we're going to need things, too. Don't run out ahead of Him, Corrie. When the time comes that some of us will have to die, you will look into your heart and find the strength you need-- just in time."
Off-screen the film’s star found her own “boy next door” in director Minnelli. A confusing and tumultuous relationship, the two were married and begat Liza with a Z. However, whatever problems their future held, the two created a film musical masterpiece and the biggest financial hit MGM released since Gone With The Wind. There were many nostalgic period copy cats (Summer Holiday and Fox’s Centennial Summer) but none even came close to this jewel.
The dress below is from Dahlia on ASOS in the sale and it's the prettiest thing ever! Apologies for the bad lighting, the weather has been truly awful (gale force winds?!) so I've not been able to snap a pic outside for you guys yet. The contrast material in black makes this dress super flattering. As much as I love Dahlia, I would definitely be hesitant to purchase this at full price which was originally £65 on Asos (however, I know they mark it up a little from the actual Dahlia website) just because of the quality of the material. It IS very lovely though and I can't wait to wear it with thick tights, cardigans and then bare legged in the Summer!
She realized if she were to do well at this sport she would have to work doubly hard.
I'm also starting to get little bits of communication that show me that she understands past/present/future. The other day, Jackson was off for a day of fun with his Beeka. I treated Kira and I to pizza for lunch. When Derek got home that evening, I said, "Daddy, Kira and I went to lunch today." and she said "Pizza" without any prompting. That was very cool. Jackson and I were able to talk about his day, etc, so very early. It's one of the things that I'm so ready for with Kira. We're getting there.
What would you do? Just ignore the mail?
The problem with their occupation is two fold.
THINGS I REALLY LOVE
5. Hey, they had to let Ringo sing sometimes, right?
1 disrupt
Ingredients for Base
There is a strange twist to the High Street – literally. From the church it seems to curve to the right, which is the direction taken by motor traffic. The further section, however, is called Surrey Road. The High Street itself continues by shooting off to the left, now as a pedestrian precinct, the beginning of which is marked by the Millennium Clock. Littlehampton is, in my opinion, a lovely little town. It looks good and is a comfortable place to be in. Lapses in taste are therefore all the more surprising and to be regretted. I am prompted to that remarks because this is the ugliest Millennium clock I have so far encountered. I assume it is supposed to represent a lighthouse but if so, it’s a pretty naff attempt. I do hope they knock it down and put up something more becoming to their pretty town.
6. Change equals growth, not pain.
And, I know it sounds crazy right now, but I think you'd really like this other project.
Though initially embarrassed and uneasy over sharing a room, they were both very tired and fell asleep quickly.....
Hindi ko masabi sa sarili kong, “Kuha mo ha!”sabay ngiti.
Well beauty lovers, I think I have found it! Yes you can go to MAC and pick up the VIVA GLAM Nicki and help charity or you can spend less than a fiver and get them same look for less.
When you bring a dog in, you go from an individual, or a house full of individuals, to a pack. To understand how a pack works, think about a time when you were around someone who was feeling a certain way -- whether sad, angry or even happy -- and how it started to affect your mood. Multiply that by the number of animals and people in your household and you get an idea of how a pack works. When you bring a dog into your house, you are bringing an animal who is literally hardwired to be your lifelong companion. Dogs are empathetic to their humans in a way no other animal, including other people, can be. Because of this, owning a dog means you have to be more in touch with your feelings, and through that, the feelings of your household.
is made me stronger
Reference :
Hold me while I convulse to this.
UNIQUE TO THE MAX, BROTHERS AND SISTERS!!!!
i believe in the concept that is America.
OUR ANNUAL DEFICIT IS NOW 11.2% OF OUR GDP!!
Although it's been said
All of this leaves me feeling weak and manipulated, in every direction, and amazing in many ways manipulated me too, to fulfill a need of his somehow that I do not entirely understand and that he did not either when I asked him why. I can still hear Amazing saying “I don’t know” in response to my asking “why?” It was then I had concluded that he was likely beyond a point of no return… of being damaged by his wife.
Danielle and Becky have competition though: the adorable Olivier (who presented a menswear collection in his pre-show portfolio, so I had nothing to go by) is making very chicly understated clothing. The palette is a bit grey and beige, but I am totally down with that. This week's challenge (unconventional materials from a pet store) allowed him to make an excellent top from a dog bed, and an ombre skirt from hamster bedding. It was a winner! I am excited to see him make more sleek minimalist pieces in pale neutral palettes. Man, I am so there.
These were the things almost all of them said they wished to do once all their life desires were fulfilled. And when asked why, all of them said mostly because they always wanted to do these things but are too busy fulfilling their dreams and desires. And they also said that if they do these things listed above, they will bring more meaning to their lives and feel they have accomplished something and make themselves worthwhile and meaningful. By doing these, it will bring them lot of happiness and peace.
Throughout the years, the feeling of always wanting to be together never left. We took time off from each other to rejuvenate once in awhile. And we couldn't wait to get home to each other. We called each other every day at work to check in. We were honest with each other and we did not hide our feelings. If things bothered us, we said something and then worked on it. We compromised in everything we did. We were open and honest in the bedroom as well. We were so proud to say that we never, ever stepped outside of the marriage because we were happy and content. Not many people can say they were faithful for 23 years.
With here a blossom sailing,
Our old friend Terrence is once again a sad and withered shadow of his former self, with a tendency to lurk in the corner of the living room (behind a pile of crap, natch), grunting and muttering to himself about his former glories and the merry killing sprees in which he used to indulge.
Of those early breweries, the first to get a product to the supermarket in Oregon was Full Sail, which began bottling beers shortly after its founding in 1987. It was a modest beginning. Their first year, they brewed but 2,000 barrels, and their operation looked more like large scale homebrewing than small-scale commercial brewing. After they brewed a batch, two employees bottled and capped the beer by hand while the receptionist prepared the labels with glue in the office.
I raised a great son who has turned into a honorable man. I'm not a bad parent dispite what my parents think.
September 11, 2001
Burt Plain, AUSTRALIA (strange)
Life really is like the coastline with its ups and downs and rugged and smooth patches and a little help every now and then doesn’t hurt.
Sam Cooke
As there has not been an official Hello Thursday announcement yet from PC I'm going to hold off posting the new carts. And there's so many this month!
Their wives
I like order. I like symmetry. I like traditional, classic foundations. But, more than I want those things, I want my children to really love their rooms! And to look back on those rooms fondly as an especially sweet part of their childhood. In decorating their rooms, I want to show them that their preferences, their personalities, their individualities matter. That what they think is beautiful has worth.
So far things were going well. Everyone was energized, occasionally hooting and hollering in enthusiasm. Every so often I’d get a little tired, and wonder if I could get through the second half of the event. But then I’d look at our Special Olympics Athlete, Shaun Woolf, who was spinning on a bike in front of me. He was powering through our threats! His determination inspired me to continue even if I questioned whether or not I could.
tidying up
now it is time
These findings come from a new study by scientists from Facebook and the University of Milan. Before you poo-poo it because it was sponsored by 2011’s version of Big Brother, consider that the cohort for the study was 721 million people. Facebook users, yes, but also a full 10% of the world’s populations. Zoinks.
have i already started boring you?
is in the air; it definitely was in my step this morning when I got out of bed and treaded footfall to the shower. I could of whistled a merry air a lá Seven Dwarves (whistle while you work) but I was thinking of fame and how Andy Warhol (American Pop Artist) stated in the 1960s that ’ in the future everyone will be famous for fifteen minutes.’
I still have acupuncture once a month. It helps my liver stay happy and the toxins to keep moving out of my system, as well as removing any energy block. Be sure to ask for a referral to a TCM trained acupuncturist. Mine is a wonderful woman who apprenticed with a Chinese doctor in China.
but that's for another day!
I was inspired to do a couple of these to replace the last 2 similar ones (scroll a 3rd of the way down) which have gone off to the Elgol Shop along with a small card order. Elgol is at the beautiful end of another peninsula on Skye. I'll add some beads & possibly some hand stitching after work tomorrow. Strips of recycled fabric, velvet heart & a tiny piece of matching painted paper. I wish I'd printed that fabric, too. (I miss that dress!)
I’m making this blanket for an internet friend. She should be having her baby any day now!
According to Howell, below are the nine essential beats that make up the structure of every great story.
When we got started on our project today, my Nana said, “You know… there’s this company called Motts…” which of course the Camp Guy thought was terribly funny! I have to tell you, though, with no ill will to Motts, they never had so much entertainment in the kitchen as we do!
On His Own made a winning debut for owner/trainer Oliver McKiernan in a point-to-point at Maralin in October, 2009, and the Presenting gelding also enjoyed a winning start to his career under Rules when taking a Leopardstown bumper in December of the same year. He was bought by trainer Howard Johnson, acting on behalf of Graham Wylie, for a then-record £240,000 at Brightwells January Sale in January, 2010. On His Own was pitched into Grade One company for his first start for Wylie and Johnson but faded to come home down the field behind Cue Card in the Weatherbys Champion Bumper at the 2010 Cheltenham Festival. He made just one start over hurdles, finishing fourth behind Bobs Worth in a Cheltenham novices’ hurdle on New Year’s Day, 2011, before a successful debut over fences two weeks later with a comfortable success over subsequent Scottish Grand National runner-up Nine De Sivola in a beginners’ chase at Musselburgh. He was pulled up in the National Hunt Chase at the 2011 Cheltenham Festival but ended the season on a high note with an impressive victory in a novices’ handicap chase at Ayr’s Scottish National meeting. On His Own was transferred to the care of Willie Mullins for the start of the 2011/2012 season, after Johnson was banned for four years. He was brought down when beaten at the penultimate fence in the valuable Paddy Power Chase at Leopardstown on December 27, his first start for Ireland’s champion trainer. The lightly-raced horse returned to form with a career-best performance in the Thyestes Handicap Chase at Thurles on January 26, when he stayed on well to beat Tullintain by 13 lengths.
BRISSC is where my healing journey begins. Instead of burying my past I bring it out into the light and I weep endless tears for the tragedy that will never be completely over until I can grasp sanity and unload these automatic, deep-seated responses that leave me reeling in the aftermath of my own unconstrained chaos. I am learning to be patient, kind and compassionate to myself. I am learning to honour all that I have done to survive and I am learning that it is my story and all the opinions in the world will not change cause and effect. Lastly I have learned that the crimes perpetuated against me is a crime that just keeps on giving and I accept that I am defined, impacted and informed by these events the same way early childhood experience defines, impacts and informs every other child on the planet.
I love the stitched stocking stamp set and coordinating punch. At first glance, it seems like it is soo limited to just stockings...but leave it to crafters to get creative with how they use their tools!! So awesome. I have seen it used as a hobby horse, baby booties, and even two together can make it into a sweater!! Gotta have tools that have more than one purpose...as long as it has more than one purpose, we can buy it....right?? ha ha ha
The cupid I have found on the Internet and I cut it out with the eCraft The little fellow is very similar to that of Tim! Unfortunately I have no honeycomb paper. And I did a different technique with aluminum foil and alcohol ink, in this case a copic marker, from the last 12 tags.
The brochure is available for your perusal online, the exact same one that I received, although it loses a little of its heart-string pulling effect to see it on the screen instead of feeling that 100% Post Consumer Recycled beige paper in your guilty American 1% Elitist Oppressor lily white callous-free hands.
BOOMING BASSLINES
in the taking. Close your eyes now,
I used quite mature knotweed shoots for this, up to three feet tall, but not leafed out yet. The skin for larger stems is tough and must be peeled off, much the way you'd pull strings from rhubarb or celery. This exposes the pale, bright green, crisp and sour knotweed stem. I also discarded the joints between segments, considering them too fibrous for the smooth puree that I wanted.
27 MORE than 150 countries are known to use torture.
(I'm indebted to Joseph Despins and Howard Gerwing for their kindness and generosity in the preparation of this piece.)
sink into the spaces between knees, brush bottoms
It's been three weeks since I stopped coffee cold turkey. Shockingly, I still make it through my days. My life has not fallen apart. I am not completely void of energy as I feared that I would be. Could it be that I have a deeper source of energy than coffee?
Unlike Australia, where the “many pathways to uni” slogan is publicised and accepted, in south Asian countries, getting into the top university is “like religion,” Dr. Jawahar Surisetti, an Indian education expert and psychologist, tells Merinews. “It is ingrained in the students’ mind that this is the final destination – nothing more, nothing less.”
It’s all about….Gossiping. We all do it, and it can be fun especially for girls. But it can also be destructive. I am not going to lecture you about its impact, well technically I am so leave now if you don’t want to hear a rant. I am no saint so I can’t say I have never gossiped but recently after hearing some untruthful gossip about myself it made me question why people do it, why do I do it? Is it really because people are insecure? Perhaps there is some truth in that statement, as the ones who seem to gossip are the one’s who have little to do in their own lives except stand around and talk about other people’s lives and how it sucks for them!
She raised her hand to her dealer, Wayne, for a short pause then swiveled in her stool to face the man beside her.
36. Understands that separately we are nothing, but together we are everything…unstoppable…and immovable force…team of we
Difference this time ‘round is that I’m keeping the beard for now because it’s the way I would have last appeared to my mom as she lay sick and dying in a hospital bed.
There is a moment of darkness in the relationship among the 12 men and Jesus Christ. Those men who had witnessed all those amazing, miraculous events, forgot Jesus Christ. They betrayed him, not as Judas did – by a kiss – but by disappearing the only moment Jesus needed them. The moment of His torture, the moment of His trial and His pain; they were not there for Him. We do well know how Peter denied Him three times…but he was not the only one.
THE FUCK IS THIS SHIT?!?!
Starting October we will go to full gallery hours...
“The Christians, you know, worship a man to this day – the distinguished personage who introduced their novel rites, and was crucified on that account… You see, these misguided creatures start with the general conviction that they are immortal for all time, which explains the contempt of death and voluntary self-devotion which are so common among them; and then it was impressed upon them by their original lawgiver that they are all brothers, from the moment that they are converted, and deny the gods of Greece, and worship the crucified sage, and live after his laws.”
Canada, not unaware of America’s historical aggressive designs had earlier developed “Defence Scheme No. 1” which, in the event of hostilities, called for flying columns to quickly enter American territory. These small mobile forces were to capture such cities as Seattle, Minneapolis and Albany, and then fall back in a scorched earth retreat that would slow down the invading Americans, giving Great Britain time to re-enforce Canada.
But it was worth it. This is what Virginia City would have looked like in about 1860, when the tents had given way to wood buildings but brick or stone edifices were still rare. Certain vistas reminded me of Grafton T. Brown's 1861 lithograph of Virginia City, where you can see outhouses and mine equipment behind frame houses on a steep hill. The boardwalk at Bodie was welcome and when we arrived in Virginia City later that day I realized how deadly her steep streets would have been with icy snow and mud on them.
Jenny Tonge said no more than the obvious. A state that feeds off war, that is incapable of coming to terms with its own population, which treats 20% of its own citizens as guests and refuses to acknowledge a unitary Israeli citizenship is not destined long for this world.
04 - Satisfied Man 05:00
Okay, okay... not EXACTLY my life, but select moments/incidents or aspects of my life - past, present, and hopes of the future. I just have so many awkward and funny things happen to me and those surrounding me, and my family is a bit crazy (which is hilarious and fun)... I think it's time I share that hilarity and awkwardidity... awkwardness.
You'll understand why I want you so desperately, Right now I'm looking at you and I can't believe, You don't know, You don't know you're beautiful, Oh oh,
Smuttynose Finest Kind IPA
Cassandra glared at him.
with the stroke of a pen.
I really like this guy but there is on MAJOR problem: he has a mustache. And not a thick, sexy ‘stache but a pathetically puny one that he can’t quit talking about. How do I tell him to shave it without hurting his feelings? He has so many great qualities and I just want him to realize that wimpy facial hair is not his strong suite.
1 silence
Now I would be a terrible host and have a totally lame party without foods and drinks. So help yourself to the goodies that are out. Lots of noms, drinks. Just remember kittens, milk or water only until you are one year old!
no longer
Beck eyeballed Claypool, noticing a single stream of sweat rolling down the engineer’s pasty cheek as the event unfolded. Damien smiled inside; watching the smarmy little crybaby provided a brief moment of guilty pleasure.
And surpliced the city in white;
The band has gained in popularity after self-promotion via MySpace.com; they were selected as the official MySpace band on the 2006 Warped Tour. They were also included in the ’100 Bands You Need To Know In 2006′ in the April 2006 edition of Alternative Press magazine.See More
Tolkien coined the term "sub-creation" to express the idea that we mere mortals have an intrinsic desire to create through our arts because we were made in the image of our creator. Like him, we want to bring things into being. Unlike him, it is only from our imaginations that we can do this. So we are not creators, since we have nothing to work with that was not created by God, but we are sub-creators.
While Google is a great resource don't forget about the salespeople who know their business inside and out. They will know everything from where to find what you're looking for to whether or not it's even available. So call or email local stores that sell related or similar items and ask them if they have, can get or know where you can get whatever it is you're looking for.
How useful do you think social media sites are for up-and-coming artists?
Here’s some photos of the Litterlocker:
At the trial News of the World editor Andrew Coulson testified to having no knowledge of Sheridan’s phone being hacked and that “no culture of hacking” existed at the newspaper. Coulson also claimed he was never in contact with Mulcaire and that he did not even know his name until Mulcaire had been arrested, telling the court: ”I never met him, spoke to him or emailed him.”
4.Bake in the preheated oven until the crescent dough has puffed and turned golden brown, about 30 minutes. Allow to cool 10 minutes before serving
Become a fanatic about saving quarters. Experienced RVers have found they can’t have enough quarters. 35mm film canisters make excellent containers for quarters (if you can still find them). Each canister will hold $7.00 worth.
When Annie Allen watches her brother, Owen, sail off on the Titanic, she never even imagined that it would be the las time she’d ever see or hear him again. The last person she had left who loved her was gone. Now, with Owen gone, Annie has to navigate English life all alone, all while holding back the resentment and anger she feels for Michael Dunnagan, the man who survived because of Owen’s sacrifice.
By applying this to the NPCs in your dungeons, you can easily figure out who knows what if the PCs decide to talk to or take someone alive.
After the two minute stir, you then pour the mixture into another clean cup and stir for two more minutes. Then you are ready to pour. You pour the mixture in the center and allow it to spread, aiding it when necessary with the popsicle stick. Don’t push down on it, don’t try to thin it. (No step by step photos here. This stuff sets quickly, so you have to move.)
OnStar Mobile was developed from the ground-up by engineers in the OnStar EV Lab. In addition to this work, the team is leveraging OnStar’s connectivity to the vehicle to gather real-time data about development models of the Volt as they are tested. OnStar engineers then share this real-time data with the Volt engineering team to speed the development process and help ensure quality at the start of production.
What’s the point of making so much “promises” at the start of a new age if nothing can be done? That’s why — I will make sure that all these promises hold firm.
* What advice would you give writers trying to write picture books?
On Saturday I felt like I was at big-kid-camp. We gathered around the flames, sipping our coffee and chatting while the eggs sizzled. We mowed that food as if dinner were a vague, far-off dream.
I got the yarn out :0)
I'm much too tired to smile,
“And you’re no better!” Mel said, his nose twitching, “You say that I got no guts? Well, just you remember what happened when they came!”
The local news media groups dominating on Facebook include the Jang Group, Express and Dawn, with Samaa close behind.
Inside the deep jungle, the foilage was thick and tangled William’s feet beneath him. He crashed loudly through the underbrush, his hatchet lost to the river. William crushed down small trees and bushes beneath his boots to clear a path. Several times, unable to push through the dense jungle, he worked his way around. He was relatively sure he was heading in a straight path.
Diana gazed down from the Picture Gallery at the thrilling sight of the elegant Prince dancing the night away, sometimes with Sarah, sometimes with the other lovely, sophisticated girls in his life, all of them more self-possessed and more accomplished than she: Lady Leonora Lichfield, Gerald Grosvenor's beautiful sister; Lady Jane Wellesley, the cool daughter of the Duke of Wellington; the curvaceous screen actress Susan George; Lady Tryon, glamour-girl Australian spouse of Charles's shooting friend Anthony; and one especially intimate-seeming dance partner, the confident, laughing blonde Camilla Parker Bowles.
Here's an example of not delivering results: The incomes of the bottom four-fifths of Americans have fallen 10 percent, adjusted for inflation, over the last three decades, despite massive improvements in worker productivity. For an example of not being just and fair, we need not go far: Self-dealing financial elites defrauded markets and the government of trillions of dollars realized during the 2008 financial panic, and not one of them went to jail.
Designed by humans to sound human, Arkam reminded himself.
Starring: Boris Karloff, Anna Lee, John Loder, Donald Calthorp, and Frank Cellier
One of my favourite things I found while I was out this weekend were these fab sneakers:
948 **D-VI/6(A)/1986. “Henry V and Shakespeare at Agincourt.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. See, also, Item D-XI/3/1991, below. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(3), above, pp. 37-60.)
I miss the sound of him sleeping in my study as I read.
TUMBUDU NEMANGO TI NG IN I
The pattern was fairly simple to follow, starting with 3 bead in the centre of the elastic then a fourth bead threaded on with the ends of the elastic crossing over through the bead, when you pulled the bead down to meet the first three the pattern began to show immediately. 2 more beads one on each end of the thread, another cross over bead and repeat until you have a strip of beading long enough to go around you wrist. The first layer was then complete.
Dear, if you turn your head,
A crisis in the U.S. public education system poses a “very grave national security threat,” requiring an overhaul to offer families more choices, business, education and political leaders said in a report.
The state has so far failed to collect even 25% of the fines levied against the more than $4 million spent to date in enforcement of the ordinance. The Department of Health is already looking for alternative funding for the Quit Line and enforcement beyond the $1 million in federal stimulus dollars for the Quit Line’s operation through Jan. 1. If the Anti-Tobacco advocates continue to use their standard play-book, (and they are nothing if not predictable in their mean spirited deliberateness of purpose), watch for a proposal to increase the state cigarette tax again, so that smokers can continue to provide employment for these petty tyrants, and to pay for the continued persecution of smokers to be administered by those who claim to care so very much about them.
Hello Jerry,
Monday, December 10th–I watched “The League of Extraordinary Gentlemen” and “Maurice.”
am i a plant person? i mean like, really a plant person?
60ml whipped cream (1/4 cup)*
3. I am loving all of the running blogs I am reading. They are really helping. I appreciate every runner who writes regularly. It makes a big difference in me sticking to it. One of my favorite blog posts this week was one from THE GREAT FITNESS EXPERIMENT about makeup made specifically to work out. Seriously, not for me!
but this one makes me smile the most.
Tris continues to be a remarkable heroine, one who certainly has her moments of fear but who always pushes forward. While she has some flaws, who she is and how she is outweighs it, creating a perfectly balanced and well fleshed out character. The way she relies on Four without being dependent makes for a great realistic element, and helps to build not only the romance but the friendship between the two. Facing down some pretty rough events, and having some nearly impossible choices to make, Tris is a character who readers will back fully while still worrying about the outcome of everything.
And for a quiet ‘this is not a New Year’s Eve dinner’, I am contemplating a bottle of Crémant de Limoux Rosé from Domaine Rives Blanques, and a bottle of Domaine de Clovallon’s best Pinot Noir, 2006 les Pomarèdes to accompany a guinea fowl.
Owen Wilson plays a successful screenwriter trying to pursue his passion and publish a novel. He finds Paris a rich muse and tries to convince his terribly incompatible fiancée (Rachel McAdams) to move there. Unsuccessful, he begins taking late night strolls on his own through the streets of Paris where, at midnight, he ventures back in time to what he considers the “golden age”, the 1920′s, and hangs out with his artistic heroes.
Claudius has always gained what he desired through murder and manipulation. Disguised as a priest, the former druid claws his way to through the Christian church in only a few years.
1) The most amazingly fun back cover copy, courtesy of uber-editor, Ms. Stacy Cantor Abrams.
Michael Floyd is a good player, but their offensive line is awful, and although they got some good value, they didn’t address it until the 4th round. Also, when they picked defense, they went with defensive backs, when I thought they needed linebacker depth.
I think it only fair if you’re interested in them you go directly to the source….as she is SO GRACIOUS to freely share these files……..
I have forgotten, and no matter how far and wide I search I still cannot find what I am looking for.
Let me explain, and keep in mind this is coming only from my own perspective. The male body in itself means nothing to us because a body is just a body; women don't get turned unless there's an emotional attachment. Even when I was single, I never had any desire to see the Chippendale's or Thunder Down Under. Why would I be fawning over someone I didn't even know? Besides that, too-perfect male bodies are intimidating to us; we're not secure enough about our own bodies to be with, or even appreciate from afar, a guy's body that's too sculpted. Not to mention, we also presume there's underlying ego issues beneath all those muscles and all that time in the gym that we simply don't want to deal with. Real men have meat--and fat--on their bones!
To enter, head on over to the EHAG Emporium blog, leave a comment telling about your favorite decoration or piece of Halloween art! A winner will be drawn on Saturday, October 30th.
In honor of Black History Month, I’m sharing my review of “The Color Purple” by Alice Walker. This novel, which won a Pulitzer and was turned into a movie by Steven Spielberg, is a powerful story about racism and sexism, but also about friendship and survival.
Nor did it give any further details of Lord Saville's report, which is based on 12 years of hearings and deliberation.
And, Michael Jackson’s adopted home – given that he had been stripped of so much a few years back – one rental mansion after another in California. And, there’s a strangely quirky comic-book parallel – in that Orson Well’s Citizen Kane died fictionally and cinematically in pretty much similar circumstances; alone in his own never-never-land, warped of mind, corrupt and corrupted, fighting a losing battle with himself and long-since removed from the genius who’d created his own kingdom.
* improving or modifying the invention
Dear makers of fabulous movies I SWORE I would never succumb to,
Your gaze, always on me
This tutorial is fantastic! I ended up using this exact technique to make the chevrons on my card. Because I wanted my chevron to cover the entire card, I cut each paper strip 1/2" wide, adhered them to two 6"x6" pieces of paper, and cut my completed stripes into 1" strips. I had enough to make two cards.
· Experience in the payroll tax industry and development of payroll tax based solutions as well as operations experience in multiple business functions, including payroll tax operations, services, implementation, sales, delivery and product development.
Soul Sister
As you set out for Ithaca hope your road is a long one, full of adventure, full of discovery. Laistrygonians, Cyclops, angry Poseidon – don’t be afraid of them: you’ ll never find things like that on your way as long as you keep your thoughts raised high, as long as a rare excitement stirs your spirit and your body. Laistrygonians, Cyclops, wild Poseidon – you won’t encounter them unless you bring them along inside your soul, unless your soul sets them up in front of you.
“It was a great thrill to be offered the Director of Football role at Rangers. As a fan it was a wonderful experience to play such a big part in our treble winning season of 77/78. However like my transfer in 1980 my leaving at this time comes as a tremendous wrench.
Most states require that the coffin be put into a burial vault, which is the underground tomb that is made out of cement that the coffin goes into. It is then lowered into the ground. These are used to keep the ground from caving in on top of the coffin and to keep the grave site from sinking in. Some manufacturers state that they can seal the vault to keep water and the elements from getting to the actual coffin. A vault, however, does not stop the decaying of the body.
Dunkin' Donuts pulls Rachael Ray ad after complaints
Cook on low for 8-10 hours or low for 6-7 hours and then turn to high for an additional 1-1 1/2 hours, stirring occasionally. The latter is what I usually do and I know they're done when the meat begins to shred as I stir it.
The surprise of the night which was not on it's menu was deep fried fish paste stuffed Tofu with a generous topping of pineapple sauce + Thai red chillies/garlic sauce and pickled ginger on it's side.
After I came home last night, I updated the Scrivener file of my novel. It was something I’d been needing to do since last August when I dropped a critical piece of the plot. I was stalling on doing it though because I knew it would kill my word count, and it did: dropped it by like 8,000 words. But it was a relief because everything that I pulled out were scenes I knew in the back of my mind wouldn’t work. Ever. Not in any published work. Or any unpublished one for that matter. In fact, I’d've burned them but (a) I can’t burn an e-file and (b) I want to keep them as proof that I did write words, even if NO ONE WILL EVER SEE THEM.
The significance of Pattison's can be gauged by the wide geographical spread of the newspapers which reported their problems. Only two of the clippings below come from a Scottish newspaper. The others are from English and Irish newspapers.
Life may not always be easy, but when we keep our focus on God, He will fill our lives with beautiful rainbows of promise.
I love having pictures of my sweet baby in special places in my home. A home is all about family and love and it's wonderful to have special reminders about the things that matter most in my life. And it doesn't hurt to have those pictures displayed in pretty frames.
It’s still too early to give up
Spice Market – Perfection
Wash off the bite sight, then apply them. Some are far better than others. The alcohol kills any bacteria. A local pharmacist (Perth) makes his own itch relief. Rural living!
So as part of a component of a deal, I think it’s very important for us to look at what are the steps we can take short term in order to put folks back to work. I am not somebody who believes that just because we solve the deficit and debt problems short term, medium term, or long term, that that automatically solves the unemployment problem. I think we’re still going to have to do a bunch of stuff — including, for example, trade deals that are before Congress right now that could add tens of thousands of jobs.
thus, they keep gigantic propaganda and brainwashing, as well as all sorts of fear mongering (political, economical, terrorist, nationalistic, etc) – to ensure that the “sheeple” walk steadily to the slaughter-house of “where and how I can get MORE money!” mentality. although, more and more people realize the alternatives and decide to move to live and work on land. the best way to weaken the SYSTEM is to quit it: to move out from cities, grow your own food, not depend on petrol, electricity, artificially imposed goods sold in supermarkets, artificial unnecessary services, interests, hobbies, trends, fashions … in other words – EVERYTHING whatever generates the “MORE MONEY“ for the SYSTEM !
a fox in a hen house
What to do in your MS submissions? Use common sense, I'd say, and know that leaving the Oxford comma in place probably isn't going to alarm an editor!
Scandal upon scandal, nightmare upon nightmare, disgrace upon disgrace: there is seemingly no end to the depths and degradations to which nationalism is being dragged by Nick Griffin—and the time has come for him to step down for the good of the cause.
Then last Saturday evening it started snowing. Silently, big flakes started covering trees, roofs, roads, gardens, anything and everything. Weather reports said it was the heaviest snowfall in the last 15 years. Londoners were happy to have had at least one snowfall and that too so conveniently over the weekend. Sunday saw happy families playing with the snow. We thought that was the end of it. But there was more to come, yesterday evening it snowed again. So today we woke up to a partially white world. Spring seems like a distant dream, trudging through the snow, while shivering in the cold seems to be the order of the day.
Back in the early days of college football everything was simple. Students formed clubs that eventually became teams formed by students in the same class (such as “Bloody Monday” at Harvard, a game between the Sophomore and Freshman classes). This trend also hit the university of Dartmouth and continued spreading throughout the Northeast region of the country. Meanwhile similar games were being played in the south in places like Auburn, Georgia and Virginia.
As panic faded, pain rose in its place. His head ached, both from tired muscles clenching his jaw and the logic-fatigue effort of making the Axtli burn. The hand he raised to knead his forehead stung with the onset of the inevitable burns. And he was cold. Cold even though he stood right next to the fire. Shaking, he met Taslin's eyes.
* Proven team members without having a “cookie-cutter” mentality.
And so I find that I have learned from this. I learned, young, and long ago, to cherish chivalry. I sat before valuable books and learned to expect, appreciate and desire only the manliest of characters. That can’t be bad, right!
HAPPY STAMPING, FRIENDS!!! :)
“Non-marriage now is apparently a fashion among young people. I think they’re missing out on something. It’s very nice to come home and obtain catharsis by scolding your husband if you do not scold anybody in your office.”
—January 13, 2005
This flower bed took all day and a couple hours the next morning. I forgot to take a photo the next morning with the rest of the block around the flower bed. I put some of the day lilies from the other flower bed in this one along with flowers I took from other flower beds around the house. Purchased a few more. Separated some of his money grass and planted it around the inside edge of the flower bed. The next morning I also put up a shepard hook and hung two hanging flower baskets. These photos are from the end of the first day of working on it.
Finally, surrogate motherhood violates the systematic planning of Allah in the normal process of procreation.
The coffee pot is on.
Award winning author Monica Shaughnessy is a Houston native and current Katy resident that according to the buzz is the next big thing in children and adult literature. Recently I caught up with Monica between writing sessions to chat about her upcoming young adult novel, growing up in a tiny Hill Country town and techniques to chase down slippery ideas.
Luck comes in strange ways…. I’m lucky to be back in London, sleeping in my own bed tonight! Oh, no I didn’t miss out on all the volcano fun, how could i? Given my track record volcano-cancellation was just what my weird travel log was missing… just one more involuntary adventure … (remember this?)
Beldam Series: Daughter Wind
I would like to enter this into the following challenges
In the meantime, I am to introduce a lovey to take my place as cuddle-object, and some cue-music. If I keep the lovey with us whenever he is nursed to sleep, it will smell like me and he will associate it with being nursed to sleep. If I play the same music every time as he is falling asleep, he will associate that with nursing to sleep. The goal is to get to the point where the presence of the lovey and the sound of the music kick-off the sleeping process, while I slowly reduce the amount of nursing he gets before sleep until eventually he falls asleep at the sound of the music/presence of the lovey.
What would you do if this happened to you, as for me I can’t wait to see what I do with my new day my new chance to make decisions that will catch up with me when I get back to my 96th birthday on that veranda.
This mysterious Magnolia made me wait 5 years for 1 bloom. ONE!
Scotland has no direct replacement for an influential, industrial and inspirational midfielder who has played at the very highest level. Despite the emergence and form of Adam, Naismith, Forrest and Bannan, it is Fletcher’s Makelele-like ability to shield and provide the solid foundation for teams to counter.
Guess what folks? It’s another Saturday! And we all know what that means… Grace! In! Small! Things! *Cue applause*
The researchers compared cancer mortality rates across Europe between 1990 and 1994 and 2000 and 2004. So its all based on an old study that is 4 years out of date and has no hard evidence of a direct link between a quick tipple and cancer.
(Although we try not to mention eating haggis in the presence of our Hamish McHaggis. He might get a little upset!)
For some of you was awkward, for some of you
my Remington Noiseless Portable #7. That’s my first typewriter. My dad bought it for me at a garage sale when I was in junior high. My fascination with that beautiful, mysterious machine eventually developed into an incurable case of severe typewriter collecting. I still use it sometimes, and will always love it, even though it doesn’t have much of a dollar value and it isn’t the machine
Well, then it began, like dominoes falling softly on the carpet. Everything changed. Sleek stainless steel refrigerators came into people’s lives and all of a sudden, the fashion was to not put anything on the refrigerator. Why, Martha Stewart, why, was this not acceptable any longer? I would go to houses to visit and not see anything on the refrigerator. I know some of these mom’s were decent mothers. I just couldn’t get past the idea that the refrigerator should be just that, a refrigerator, and not a message board. Oh, the humanity.
Ken and my mom seldom get along, my mom believes with all her heart that Ken hates her, and so she doesn't try anymore to get along, Ken...well he is just mean to her. He talks down to her all the time, gets pissed at her over everything, and has no respect for her...and it pisses me off so bad!!!!!
and interrupt our sun-worship
In the next room, the grand-daughter smiled at her mother. She whispered, "What a great idea of Grums - it will keep them busy for ages." Then, with a yawn, "She's just settled. I'm exhausted. Shut the door behind you while I catch another forty winks."
curry leaves- 1 string
And at the present autumn he prepares the upcoming winter without that someone.
We printed out the wording, highlighted "parts" for my siblings, and taped the text into the pages of the book. This way, from our guests' perspective, they were reading straight out of A Light in the Attic.
We could also do open shelving and have some room for display. This might be a nice way to break up all the cabinetry. We could possibly keep costs down by using off-the-shelf bookcases that we would make look built-in. However, since most bookcases aren't that deep, we'd lose all that storage space behind the bookcases.
On the flip side, Tommy is getting over from poison ivy or some other kind of contact rash. It showed up on Wednesday afternoon, but we think he was in contact on Easter Sunday during the Easter Egg Hunt at my sister-in-law's. I don't blame them though. Tommy is the only kid that kept walking through the few areas of brush in their backyard. Every other kid avoided it, but Tommy walked straight through it. Benadryl at naptime or bedtime and then Benadryl cream have been helping. He's been to the doctor twice and she confirmed it's a contact rash, probably poison ivy.
It is cold here in the valley.
One lucky enough to visit the Vals after dark, enters into a space with intricately layered deep blue-gray natural stone frame.
Here is a little photo slideshow capturing some of the highlights of our journey.
As the chef responsible I repeatedly ask myself how I end up stretched like this, without a free evening in sight. Inevitably I attribute it to doing as much with this one life we’re given. Which leads me to my song of the moment. Seems the only songs of the moment I talk about are by Hedley. One Life. Have you heard it? It’s great. After hearing it blasted in the car for the umpteenth time the kids and I talked about it. We agree that life is busy. We also agree we are on the ride together, so that makes it all worth it. Happy May, everyone!
All the days of his separation shall he eat nothing that is made of the vine tree, from the kernels even to the husk. "
I will give you tips and information for how to structure and set-up your business
Blush ready for marble style? not just yet. what’s missing? a stunning, shimmering blush for a radiant, fresh look. a sensational finish for everyone, mixed from four gorgeous marble rosé shades. available in 01 swirlpool.
Coping with Harassment through the Blog
So, what advice can I give pertaining to this round of the Occupy Movement? Well, first off, if you find your route blocked by a parade, march or civil disobedience, relax and rest assured that your boss will most likely understand as this will be the big story which will be used to clarify certain focuses on the Presidential race. Next, remember that the people at these Occupy events are not all of one set of opinions and that despite the efforts to force a singular viewpoint as representing everybody, the truth is of the 99% only half of them at most probably understand the real reasons and ideas behind the protests, but hopefully they do know why they are there. And finally, life is short, the Occupy Movement really does not represent anywhere near 99% of the population, there is such a thing as the 53% (they pay 100% of the Federal income taxes), these disruptions are not spontaneous but have been planned very carefully to inconvenience as many people with the least amount of actual effort, and the Occupy Movement is actually not anywhere near a majority, the rest of us are.
I am frustrated for them..When I lost Luke 10 years ago, I wanted to wallow in pity for a few days, but life doesn't let it happen...there was too much to do. My family did not know how to treat me...my mother was worried about me, so all I could do was be strong and ease her fears. i bucked up, got back in the saddle and moved on. Everything went back to normal.
XiXi, for his first President's Day dinner, was none other than Abraham Lincoln. Using the witch hat from the dress up bin as a base, a little construction paper completed the stovepipe. Cholita put him in the shirt and tie.
We now have seven breweries operating in the area, five of which have started up during the past couple of years. They join the long established Larkins Brewery, who have recently celebrated their 25th anniversary, plus Westerham Brewery, who started operations back in 2004. Apart from the addition of a blonde summer ale, Larkins beer range has changed little over the years. The beers are full bodied, with plenty of crystal malt used in the grist. They are also well-hopped, as one would expect from a Kentish beer. Westerham, on the other hand, brew a wide range of seasonal beers in addition to their distinctive core brands, some of which are based on recipes from the original Westerham Brewery which ceased brewing in 1965. New last year were a range of continental style beers, including examples from Germany, Belgium and the Czech Republic.
And to celebrate her first release of 2 stamp sets she is having a week long PARTY, from the 14th - 19th.
Consequently, I didn’t do much else today, other than musing some of the plays that I have been working on and battling towards getting them all done and dusted!
Some jackass behind me at a red light honked the other day when I was turning right. I guess I wasn’t aggressive enough in my decision making on when to turn right on red. I generally don’t like turning right on red when I’m on my bike. At least not unless I can see lots of clear road to my left. This was in traffic with a steady line of oncoming cars making a right turn. I generally prefer to wait. I also look around a lot when I’m riding. I look at brake lights in front of me, drivers who feel it’s necessary to ride next to me, trucks entering from the right and left, and even the asphalt when I put my feet down at a stoplight. I’m hoping all of this will extend (and increase my enjoyment of) my time in the saddle.
This was comb which I removed from the highly active hive that the bees made and was in the space by her cage. See, when all the frames are in place there is the exact amount of space for them to build the comb and with her cage in the way there was a huge space. They were building this comb to fill the space so I had to remove it…I think. I was like….oh geesh, look at this – now what?
The romantic relationships are crafted with a great deal of care, our loyalty and affection genuinely torn between our short memory of Aspen and the possibilities represented by Prince Maxon, and it's nothing short of entertaining to sit back and wonder how things will progress. Though we spend the least amount of time with Aspen, America’s feelings for him resonate with us immediately, and while we may not be as moved by him as she is given the brevity of our exposure to him, we can’t deny the strength of their connection even as Maxon slowly begins to heal the wounds Aspen left behind, helping America to find the beauty in those puckered emotional scars she thought would keep her from discovering anything real in the gilded cage of The Selection.
As a part of the month-long celebration of National Poetry Month, today is “Poem in Your Pocket Day”. According to the Academy of American Poets …”The idea is simple: select a poem you love during National Poetry Month then carry it with you to share with co-workers, family, and friends. You can also share your poem selection on Twitter by using the hashtag #pocketpoem.”
Best: Finding my voice, becoming stronger, sharing my story, paying-it-forward for the help I DID receive and educating about the help I DID NOT. Encouraging people to press on, and, hopefully there’s a laugh or two along the way as well.
With cold and flu season just around the corner I'm sure any amount of breast milk would be good for Nathan. But is 2 ozs daily enough; is it even worth it? This is where I'm torn and feel guilty about quitting. Although I'd still nurse when I get home from work and when/if he wakes at night.
It's plausible that HDC could establish similar criteria. The AY site hasn't been rezoned, would no longer contain city-owned land (it would be owned by the state), and arguably wouldn't "spark" nearby development, which is mostly doing fine, albeit mostly market-rate housing.
This borderline psychotic insistence on salvage is my undoing and my strength; while I 'miss out' on developing my ideas with cast metal, powder coated or electroplated forms, I often come up with new ideas simply through looking for alternatives. Cast metal ideas are turned by my mind into forms of leather and canvas; ideas about crystals or diamonds are planned in materials like thrifted wine glass stems, or cut up CDs.
- Building data systems that measure student growth and success, and inform teachers and principals how to improve instruction;
(oh and another rant or blog for another time, make sure to have your stage plot and Input lists available for download on your website!)
The Flirty Blog is the center of my social media universe. From there Facebook is my strongest web presence that brings readers to the blog and my website. After that I've had success with Pinterest and have just started experimenting with Tumblr because the whole Twitter thing just wasn't working out for me. I RSS feed my blog posts to LinkedIn where, on occasion, someone finds a post interesting enough to take it viral on LinkedIn. Sadly, the Pluto in my universe would be Google+. Which isn't to say it will always be there. It just is right now.
"That's easy, shouldn't take too long", I caught myself thinking, knowing how some of his 'projects' seem to take shape organically and hence become quite time-consuming.
- patterned card from First Edition 'Bird Song' stack. The lacy trimming was punched using a Martha Stewart favourite
11. The Rum Diary - It's Midnight
I’m a sucker for Cold War Kids. I think their songwriting is stellar; they fold stories within stories, and with as many colorful details, they say something plain and obvious in a way that feels like Bukowski poetry at times, Hunter Thompson truth other times. The kind of word painting that pleases my mind.
Sometimes I feel like that's exactly what every reader (be they blogger or student or overworked professional) needs the opportunity to take a moment to remind themselves why they love reading. I remember reading Pride & Prejudice for a course on Romanticism during college. It'd been months since I'd had time to read a book for fun. Even though it was an assignment, I devoured it like a person starving for fiction.
I'm sorry? Kids will ENJOY hearing this?
When I was in Paris in September Forest was in the process of moving to a small apartment in the 18th arrondissement, an area I hadn't spent much time in before but was excited to explore. The area is know mainly as Montmartre and is home to the gorgeous Sacre Coeur basilica and it's equally gorgeous views of the city.
‘What about Medicaid?’
"How about one word that describes you? Like "Bubbly." Maybe you could do an acronym? B.R.E.E. Beautifully Ranting Every... darn, I lost it. Anyway, something like that? Hope this helps! :)"
Clean out and cut back. Loads of dead leaves and rotten stalks on plants can harbor disease, even through the winter season. But, don’t cut all your plants back to the ground, and don’t pick up every leaf. It is a great treat to leave some seed heads on plants for the winter birds and ornamental grasses for their winter art in the garden. Leaving some plant stalks to protect the crowns of tender perennials is also beneficial.
He recovered quickly though, and in an equally loud voice replied: "No, I've come to inquire about a sex change operation... and I'd like the same doctor that did yours!"
Beeline is a leading worldwide developer and publisher of games for smartphone platforms. A wholly owned subsidiary of Capcom, Beeline was formed with the mandate of creating original and licensed games specifically designed for unique play style of the smartphone gamer.
Welcome to another challenge here at Woodware USA!! July is coming to a close, and a hot close at that! We have been so fortunate to have Renee join us as our July guest designer. She has such a talent, and I admire all of the details she adds and color combinations that she employs! Thanks to Renee for helping us this month! Her beautiful card is featured first on our post today!
Roll thawed rolls in sugar mixture and place evenly in pan.
Each Driver from the footplate hales
Still, if you were to present all these facts to your fiancé, and try to convince her to accept a simulated diamond, a manufactured diamond or even some other natural gem, chances are her eyes would narrow, her voice would harden and she would calmly state that she requires the real deal. And perhaps that’s what a diamond ring is about. There is nothing sensible about a diamond. It’s not a great investment nor is it a symbol of undying love. Rather, it’s tangible proof that you are willing to put your love for another human being above yourself. You are putting her wishes above your own. In other words, you are truly ready to completely surrender yourself to the compromises inherent in a healthy marriage. Which brings us to the fifth “C” of the process: “capitulation?” Or is it “clueless?”
Windshield covers. A "see-through" sunscreen is used during the summer. It blocks most of the sun but still admits light and we can see what's going on outside. Mounting it inside keeps the sunscreen clean but allows the windshield to receive the full brunt of the sun's heat.
I think I just saw a blurb, as I was logging into WordPress, about breaking in a new pair of shoes. This is definitely a formidable task. However, one doesn’t often see anything about breaking in a new life.
Truthfully, right now, I’m struggling with keeping my mind busy. I’m home, no internet for the computer (that’s right… Going mobile on y’all), barely any phone signal (finding it is an art; currently my phone is sitting in the middle of my bed, propped up by a folded blanket) and frankly, talking to my family can sometimes be trying, so I try to leave them alone (its best for both sides). Reading has worked somewhat (near impossible when you have Lil jumping all over you), video games have been somewhat successful (Lil and J have been off the wall since they got back from school) and social media has adequately soothed the burn of loneliness. Music is now my latest treatment (rocking Muse, Iron and Wine, Red, Bassnectar, and a little bit of country… Diverse taste, I know) and writing this is just an added bonus.
'Is this your husband?' the Lord asked...
Anwaar: Why are you three here?
Iceland ranks: 1st (15.6 years)
Optional: Enlist the baby in blowing on the hot food. Phooo! Phooo!
WOW!!! Have you ever spent WAAYYY too much time on ONE card!! Well, this one took me all day! At least it seemed that way ;-)
The one where the group of girls is out dancing and they're having a blast out on the dance floor. They have the discreet little tampon tucked into the pocket of their perfect size four jeans. Meanwhile there's a group of handsome young men standing around giving each of them they eye.
A tandem rider is stopped by a police car.
The formula is a little sheer so I would probably wear 3 coats next time (pictures are 2 coats). And since it's quite sheer, I wonder how it would look layered over darker colours?! Maybe it will be similar to CND 24k sparkle!
Dear Fatalgrind readers,
Speaking of Oncology- I am preparing for my first nurse practitioner job interview in a few weeks!!!! I applied for a hematology/oncology position at a clinic about 30 minutes away and they called me the next day to speak with the medical director. I felt like an idiot but I asked for a face to face interview anyways and she said yes. They're looking to replace their nurse practitioner that has been there for 15 years, so for them to hire a new grad might be a long shot. Especially considering I would be the only NP there-the rest are physicians. I'm incredibly anxious and if anything comes out of this, I am realizing that I might actually want to go the Oncology route vs. family practice because I got really excited that they called me. But I'm not going to jump through hoops to get it-I still love family practice and the right job for me should not be a struggle to get. I believe in fate.
And here is one for April
Our next stop took us to tiny Lake Quinault Resort for a few nights stay and a trip to the Hoh Rainforest (yeah, we have rainforests in NW USA!). We were able to meet some really fantastic folks who run the resort, as well as, another family visiting for the weekend. We were able to share dinner with them both nights we stayed, and Cathy even "traded" Facebook links with them! We toasted to #IPADay (quietly to ourselves), as our new friends were drinking Coors Light and Tecate! To each his own, I say!
Ms X believes that Emma’s problems first began after she received her eight week routine vaccinations. Within hours of the vaccinations she became weak and feverish, refusing feeds. Worried, Ms X took Emma to the local hospital where doctors assured her that Emma had picked up a virus and would be fine. Not connecting the illness to the vaccinations, and blissfully unaware that this was only the beginning of her daughters problems, Ms X took her baby home.
Sagbo last month became the first black person to be elected to office in Russia.
She took a shower then prayed.After that she went downstairs to have lunch with the rest of the family .Her mother and her sister were watching her as she was savouring every bite of her food.She looked weird but none of them said something.
Quilt market is where everyone who is selling something related to quilting goes to show off their new products to store owners/vendors. The vendors can see what is coming out and place orders. For example, Riley Blake Fabrics, Moda, Michael Miller etc. all have booths showcasing their latest lines of fabric coming out. It is aisles and aisles of booths of great displays and lots of fun. Their are school house sessions where store owners can listen to particular companies talk about their new products. It is a closed trade show, which means it is not open to the public. I see on the website that they have had to add an 'overflow hotel', as so many people have booked rooms to fill up the 3 host hotels. It sounds like it is gearing up for a grand time.
Participants discuss their concerns in any of the fifty tourism sub-sectors found in the workbook which contains 350 questions to help raise their level of awareness.
Awn Al-Khasawneh, Jordan’s prime minister, has resigned during an official visit to Turkey and will be replaced by Fayez al-Tarawneh.
QVC parent Liberty Interactive’s revenue increased 8 percent to $2.1 billion and adjusted OIBDA increased 1 percent to $377 million, while operating income increased 2 percent to $224 million. The increase in revenue, adjusted OIBDA, and operating income for the quarter were primarily due to favorable results at QVC.
However, Mike Lanza wanted more for his children. He realized the value of unstructured play in his own life and in children's development. Children need to engage in unstructured play to develop leadership skills, learn to negotiate with others, and experience physical and emotional freedom. So he took action. He figured out how to carve out the play space needed for his family and neighborhood. And in Playborhood:Turn Your Neighborhood Into a Place for Play, Mike Lanza tells what he did, and how he did it. In addition, he offers a range of case studies from different settings--urban, rural, and suburban. Step by step, in his very readable style, he gives the information and inspiration parents need to create safe play spaces in their neighborhoods.
The cradle of humanity has become a forgotten desert. Yet through the natural course of time, this fate befalls the rest of the world too. As long as there is life there to suck up the nutrients and resources, it will die eventually. All things must pass. But this could be avoided if nature is allowed to take over once more.
As a kid and teen I was keenly aware of Forbidden Planet through the monster movie mags and such, but it was one of those seemingly unattainable goals to see it. Finally, when I lived in Ft. Lauderdale FL as a teen, around 1978 I went to a showing at a nearby public library. I took along my Radio Shack flat tape recorder and sat near the projector, taping the whole thing. I was like a dream come true to finally see it! I listened to the tapes of it many time later, projector noise and all. Now I can take out my Special Edition DVD and watch it on the big plasma screen any time I want to. Who would have imagined that, back then? It would have seemed like a science fiction fantasy to me at the time.
Even worse, I’m still not caught up. Today I return the Noise Canceling earphones to pay more bills.
Apparently around 500 humpbacks gather in these warm waters from July to September, from their chilly feeding area in Antarctica.
My name is Alyssa, I’ve been married for almost 2 years. I have a bachelors in Psychology with a minor in sociology, but once I graduated, I realized I wanted to do something more with my life, I wanted to follow my passion, instead of just an interest. So I have decided that I want to go to culinary school sometime. For now I’m getting my degree in catering. My goal is to travel, learn from other cultures, learning different recipes and secrets, and someday have a great bakery!
I play in a band.
climbs up to your lips to seek me,
“You nearly scared me to death,” I say and tell him about the attack on my mother – a month ago, now.
Finely chop the chocolate. In a saucepan, combine the milk, water, cocoa powder and vanilla/coffee/cinnamon and bring to a boil. As soon as the mixture boils, add the chopped chocolate and cook over low heat, stirring occasionally.
About Theresa Meyers:
One fan speculated that the tattoo depicted candy, while another said it matched the strawberry Katy already has on her left ankle.
Next I made another pillow to match the gingham underneath and added a white lace trim. I think it came from a parcel from a blogger but I'm sorry I can't remember who but thank you! Hope you like the two together.
Speaking of serial killers, our latest victim marks a change in M.O. The first two were strangled, the third stabbed. I wonder if that’s because, as many speculated, Sookie was the target or if there’s something else going on.
I’m happy to see Jamie’s compassion toward Kemel. Not only does this help Jamie in the long run (by having Kemel save Jamie’s life in turn), but it is an excellent lesson in motives. To Jamie, Kemel was attacking with no discernable reason. He could have easily assumed the man was evil and let him die. In reality, we know that Kemel had been lied to by Maxtible. It is easy to make quick, incorrect judgements that can have lasting consequences. We can’t know the circumstances of those around us, whether they try to kill us in a darkened hallway, or they just drive slowly when we are stuck behind them. Mercy is a great benefit to humanity because it presumes one’s own humility and finite knowledge.
love this time of year!
Ed Orgeron
These contacts from the AWF will be really useful for when I begin travelling europe, and also for if when I want to return to the awf!
I had thrown in the point and shoot camera for the trip. I gave it to the kids to have them take photos from their perspective.
So, armed with circular saw, chalkline, hammer, screws and assorted other tools, we modified the door. And then hung it for the first time.
“Go ahead and scream,” one adult hisses menacingly at Akian. “Because guess what? You’re going to get nothing… until your mouth is shut.”
I’ve only seen one episode so my opinion might change in subsequent weeks. I liked it but wasn’t knocked out. Not like the critics. If you believe the hype, Lena Dunham is the greatest thing since Velcro. Reviewers are all raving about how fresh her voice is, but people in the ‘20s I’ve talked to all feel she’s not saying anything new. It may seem new to me and 50 year-old critics but not them. I’d be interested in your review, especially if you’re a member of that generation.
One aspect that is shown incredibly well throughout the trilogy and short story is her intelligence. Matching Kyon and Koizumi in random philosophical interludes, she shows why she was accepted into a private high school (and likely university) by reading situations with the Fake SOS Brigade well and providing us with information that the highly-emotional Kyon would not be able to discover. Unfortunately, she wasn’t able to calculate the events that would happen Friday afternoon. I would have liked to see her reaction to the instance when her traveling companions disappeared that afternoon.
** Make sure you leave a separate comment for each entry!
No, they would not.
Score: 15 points
I was inspired all over again to confront the challenge of vegan baking after watching an episode of the Food Network’s Cupcake Wars , where Chef Chloe enchanted the judges with her all vegan cupcakes. Her ginger nutmeg spice cake with vanilla bean butter cream frosting and a date caramel drizzle, topped with a sweet almond tuille was deemed “extraordinary” and “perfect” by the judges.
Last chance to get your entries in is the 5th of May. We'll be posting where The Vulcan has been every few days.
6 Cluster - Dem Wanderer 3:52
1. L. B. Boogie (Christiansen, Oberg, La Grand) 4:12
Have you ever found yourself scouring antique stores, garage sales, and your jewelry box for metal appearing, vintage-like embellishments for your crafting projects? I have countless times. I have also come up completely empty-handed on many of these occasions as well, not having found that perfect accent piece. Today I am going to show you how to make faux metal embellishments that you can alter, ink, and distress, to make exactly what you would like to see on your project.
I'm also supporting lovely Keren David's When I Was Joe, in the Simply the Book Category.
5. I can't spell.
Once this norm has taken root, there will be little to prevent it being extended to mines, banks, firms, shares, or any other asset.
Napoleon Hill
im the one who’s feelin a feelin of defeat.
When it comes to discussing them as history, however, it seems to me they are significantly different. I acknowledge there are some who would simply say that discussing both of them as history is equally impossible. I beg to differ, at least in part, when it comes to the resurrection.
Robert Bloch – The Dead Don’t Die!
I did think the change of Yoda from hand puppet to CGI was welcome . Though it remains to be seen whether this happens in the original films! Stop tinkering George!
Bonus buy: Peruvian Mahi Mahi filets, $2.99/lb. at Sprouts (through 8/4/10)
“When we get close, Bertie,” Reginald solemnly commenced with his strategy, “I expect The Beast will be away, but if it returns before we are done, I want you to distract it as best you can without putting yourself in danger. Do you understand?”
Going Potty:Mommy will try to situate herself so that you can't reach into the potty. Race her to get there first! Points given to the first to splash in the toilet water. After she has a seat, hit her repeatedly on the back with the toilet lid. Laugh maniacally. Climb up and down, up and down on the step stool in front of the sink. Open and shut the bathroom door repeatedly. Bonus points are rewarded if you are able to catch a part of your brother in the door as it shuts.
* California Department of Corporations * California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation * California Department of Developmental Services * California Department of Education * California Department of Fair Employment and Housing * California Department of Finance * California Department of Financial Institutions * California Department of Fish and Game * California Department of Food and Agriculture * California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection (CDF) * California Department of General Services
A Rushville High School senior faces a felony charge after bringing a blow-up doll to school as part of what he claims was a prank. School officials called police May 31 after a package was found in a girls’ bathroom. A deflated blow-up doll was later found inside the box. Tyell Morton, 18, was arrested on a preliminary charge of felony criminal mischief after he admitted to bringing the doll to school. …The family’s attorney, Robert Turner, said the charge is excessive. “It’s interesting that had he gone to school with a gun, there would’ve been a lesser charge. It would’ve been a Class D felony with up to three years,” he said.
On July 8 1822 the 29-year-old Shelley set off from Livorno with his friend Edward Williams, and their boat boy Charles Vivian, to return home to Lerici. The boat, Shelley's pride and joy, turned out to be badly designed and they did not survive the storm that overtook them on the way. Here are ten fantastic books that explain why he is still a living force 189 years later.
Home equity installment balances have dropped 46%, down to $150 billion in March 2012 from $275 billion in March 2008. In March 2011, delinquent balances in foreclosure totaled nearly $862 million. In March 2012, that number had decreased nearly 30% to $604 million, the lowest since mid-2007, and marking a 14% decrease from March 2011.
How did you feel when you finished the couch to 5K program?
1 can tomato sauce (this is one of those changes we’ve made. I like a lot of sauce to dip my bread in, so I added sauce and paste)
Stop! A big one! Well, a pretty big one --nowhere near the size of Jorougumo or Argiope, but bigger than the Diadem Spider I found a week or two ago. In fact, I stopped to look more closely at this one, because I think at first that it *is* the same species of Araneus that I found before, only bigger. Since her web is strung across the stream, and her abdomen is facing me, I can't get a good look at her markings... maybe if I sort of... turn half upside down.. but without falling into the water...? By this time, Shun has noticed that I am not behind him and has turned around and come back to where I am.
-Nikkei Bunko(Japanese Language Library) Internship
Hope you all have a fantastic weekend filled with loads of love & laughter!
I’ve entered, how about you?
All the Patriots did over the weekend was address needs on defense. They finally traded up and now have a potentially good defense to complement the still-explosive offense. The Patriots are a no-doubt pick to win this division.
ROB KARDASHIAN ARRESTED
Writers are a cautious (not to say paranoid) bunch. But I often see them worrying about the wrong things. My correspondent became incensed when he believed his royalty payments were being shorted, but apparently had no problem with Dodgy's print cost deduction. I also often hear from writers who are distressed about perfectly reasonable contract provisions--such as the standard list of author warranties--yet overlook really heinous language, such as a perpetual option on future works, or royalties that are cut in half for sales at standard wholesale discounts, or the absence of a reversion clause in a life-of-copyright contract.
After that, I started reading – and once I did, I was hooked. Baba Yaga was – is – amazing. This primal, unpredictable woman with many fluid identities all rolled into one: maiden, mother, crone. The Bone Mother, she is sometimes called. The essence of all womanhood, of life, really. She was the perfect figure for a story that was going to be about life and love and death and second chances, about the passions that compel us, form us, and sometimes, destroy us. I loved so much about the old girl – this ancient witch with iron teeth and removable hands who lived in a hut on chicken legs so she could outwit and outrun her enemies. Her forest was a place of transformation. Once you entered, you might come out alive, you might not, but either way, you would never be the same. It became one of the conceits for the novel – both Anastasia and Anne and ultimately the other characters as well, would have to travel to Baba Yaga’s forest. None of them would ever be the same again once that journey occurred. I even loved the way she traveled; Baba Yaga flies through the skies in a mortar, stirring the air with a pestle. The idea of grinding appealed to me greatly – that this witch would desire to metaphorically grind Anne down to the bone and see what would be left.
10-Throw It Away
Plano's Rachel Johnson should run away with the girls title as well. In 4a both El Paso Austin and Jefferson should contend for the title. Austin has one of, if not the, best 1-2 combo in the state with Isaac Spencer and Ramon Garcia, while Jefferson brings a little more depth. Both have the potential to medal.
I'm thinking lately about how much information I put out about Andrew. Addicts and alcoholics face an uphill battle for a long time. Having his every move interpreted through me no longer seems right. I'm going to leave him to his life; it feels like time to move on.
Excuse/Reason: “I have no idea how to do it.”
(click on any image to enlarge)
You can add some minced pork or chicken, ham, or sausage to add protein if you desire.
“If we have adopted the open tender system just like the Penang state government is doing we could have saved several billions ringgits.
Even though her dearest friend may be her self-proclaimed fairy godmother, Maura is mortified at being pushed into a romance with a notorious rake such as Ash. Dashing and charming, he comes to Maura’s rescue just in time to help her steal back her precious horse. As they flee across the countryside, she can’t resist his sweet seduction. But is her prince playing a role in a fairy tale to test an improbable theory, or is the love awakening in her heart proof of her own happily ever after?
If you'd like to view 'The Forest Devil' on YouTube, here it is in five clickable parts:
The role is to provide group Travel Awareness sessions to young disabled, disadvantaged and vulnerable young people from across Derbyshire as part of a wider Travel Training programme. You will be responsible for delivering 5 sessions on a range of travel based topics such as road safety and you will be working within an existing scheme of work and resources. You will be confident working independently in the community, an excellent communicator with a dynamic and innovative approach to projects. You will have or be working towards CTLLS or equivalent teaching qualifications. In addition to the Travel Awareness groups you will have a small caseload of young people that you will work with on a 1:1 basis to provide travel training to enable access to education. This role will require travel and flexible start and finish times. This role will be supervised by the full time Travel Trainer who will identify the caseload of young people.
When bad things happen by accident, we should feel no personal responsibility; morality lets us off the hook; there is no blame to pass around. But in reality the emotional freight is huge. Accidents remind people of how helpless they are. They instill survivor’s guilt and post-traumatic stress. The very unpredictability of accidents is what frightens us, and therefore, to regain a sense of control, our psyches thrash around, often in a panicked state, until we concoct an answer to fill the void.
Brittany and Alex are real, live, breathing people, as are the supporting characters. I'm in love with all these people!
Add food coloring at this point if you use some.
Good Morning, I hope you all had a wonderful Easter with your family / friends / kids and or Grandchildren. We had our Grand-babies Elliana and Mason for the weekend and had a GREAT time with them..was sad to see them go back home yesterday...but we colored Easter eggs, hid them, played with with Stewie, played with toys.. they should have slept well last night, I know we did. LOL
Rnd 2: K to bound-off sts, cast on 20 sts, k to end – 80 sts. K 2 rnds even, repeat back inc rnd, k 4 rnds even, repeat back inc rnd – 84 sts.
The revelations have reportedly reinvigorated the ruling party, with many describing Shiceka as the “poster-boy for the new ANC”, and calling for an updated Charter.
I also used the background papers that had a yellow and flowers on it.. But the best is you can get them all in one amazing grab bag.. depending on which collection you choose of course.. You can check them out by clicking HERE.
● Seminars and lectures with public health leaders
If there’s something i’ve been struggling with these years it has to still be time management. I’ve improved a lot over the last year, but I still often find myself coding for 18 -20 hours straight before turning in some assignments. Always start at least reading the assignment specifications as soon as it is posted, so that at least you’re thinking about how to solve certain solutions with enough time. Other than that, I’d recommend becoming really good with SSH to avoid the need of going to the EBU computer labs for small changes in your code that you just thought about.
"But, Frank," Tars interjected, "'unschooling' is just a negative. It's not something it's simply not something. Where's the sense in that? Where's the positive connotation?" Hmmmmnnn, ok, I agree that words are important and powerful. If the Latin borrowing sounds too negative or passive to you, howzabout a Greek one? Would "aschooling" sound more pompous, I mean, positive and active? Is it negative to be uninhibited, unfettered, undiluted, or unbiased? If it's merely the label which is a sticking point for you, try using autodidacticism; there's a powerful, positive, Greek-rooted mouthful of a word for you. Cato (the elder) was negative and even used a passive construction when he declaimed to the senate after every speech, "Carthago delenda est." The result of those negative, passive-formation words was the very positive act of the total destruction of Carthage to the point where historians report that no stone was left on stone and the fields were salted. As a result, Rome became the preeminent, uncontested power in the Mediterranean. That's a pretty active result from "negative, passive" words.
Art is the making; not the product.
The silence from Death was all that surrounded me.
I've kept detailed records....
When I was born my babysitter told my mom "she was handpicked by Merle". My Grandma Merle is my dad's mother that I never had the chance to meet. Some of the stories that I have heard make her out to be quite the woman. I love hearing my dad talk about her.
It took until about a month ago for my niece to stop asking about the babies in my belly. She kept asking if I grew Myles in my tummy, she had a hard time understanding, her parents had tried to explain to her that sometimes babies grow in people's hearts and not their tummies, but that got her even more confused.
Oracle Magazine contains technology strategy articles, sample code, tips, Oracle and partner news, how to articles for developers and DBAs, and more. Oracle (NASDAQ: ORCL) is the world’s largest enterprise software company.
The tulip frame embossing folder was used to frame the sketch. The designer paper is from the Springtime Vintage paper pack. The sentiment is from the same stamp set and was stamped with always artichoke ink onto very vanilla card stock. I used the large oval and scallop oval punch for the sentiment. I added some always artichoke seam binding ribbon and three basic pearls for the finishing touches.
What is my plan you may ask? Run, run and run some more, I’m half joking. I’ve decided to go it alone, no group, no coaching, just me, my motivation and my iPod. This may work out well, it may be my downfall, only time will tell. I decided to not sign up for one of the many running clinics that are around for several reasons, first, I just didn’t want to spend the money (this was money I could be spending on other things, like *cough* lulu *cough*) and secondly, I’m not a big fan of being tied down and committed to having to be a certain place two or three times a week at a time that doesn’t necessarily work for me.
Sanur, where I stayed is a sleepy little village – quaint shops, a lazy beach – I even found a place where some fabulous stationery and art material was sold. I could buy a small sketch book and pencils, sip lemon tea and enjoy the attention of the lady at the counter who kept asking me “Pretty Indian girl alone? First time to Bali? “
Both Wonderful creative and magical women!! Thanks for hosting!!
In Genesis 2: 15-17 we read: “The LORD God took the man and put him in the Garden of Eden to work it and take care of it. And the LORD God commanded the man, “You are free to eat from any tree in the garden; but you must not eat from the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, for when you eat from it you will certainly die.”
Overall – 16.5/20
This is HILARIOUS! I laughed so hard I cried!
Domtom Publishing delivery plenty of ‘mission’ statements on their website about their author services and knowledge of publishing but give little away to the perspective self-publishing author that actually backs this up. When a publishing company of any kind makes these kind of statements they really need to demonstrate this. An ‘About Us’ page on their website would not go a miss here. Domtom Publishing do feature their own on line bookstore, which as of April 2009, lists just ten titles.
And, the cement that glues it all together consists of a vast volume of beer consumed amidst accumulated noise that makes a summer thunderstorm pale by comparison.
Spellbinder Nestabilities
There were a few other family slices
6 Unusual Balance 5:23
Andy Coulson resigning... hmmm.
(Thank you Jayne, for your inspiring words). This painting is done in watercolor.
I don’t have the words to describe for you all the thoughts and feelings I experienced on this exquisite night dive. Remembering and mourning all those souls lost during this tragedy, while exulting in the infinite delights of such a wonderful, alien experience.
Deposit checks - check
I was actually beginning to get used to it being hot in February!
Even the ministers on the stage were gripped by the spiritual intensity of the conference. Worship artist Matt Maher told me, “This was my first Promise Keepers meeting ever, but it won’t be my last.”
All this presumes that the magic we’re discussing is theurgy, the kind of magic the Neoplatonists practiced as a preparation for the philosophic life and that modern operative mages practice for their own not dissimilar ends. There is also thaumaturgy, the manipulation of the nonrational that doesn’t attempt to free the reasoning mind from entanglement in the social and biological selves, but simply seeks power over the self and others by way of that entanglement. There’s a long history of operative mages and others who realize that theurgy is only an option for the individual, and attempt to perform thaumaturgy on their society as a whole instead. We’ll discuss that next week.
"Glasses," he rasped, motioning to the decanter. Lightning silhouetted him intermittently. Eva's mother stumbled out of bed in a drunken hurry to collect two glasses for the men.
Similarly, disturbances in the energy field in our natural surroundings lead to changes in their cellular components. If humans get ill because our energy fields are disturbed, what makes it different from other species and organisms? How long are we going to be in denial before we truly recognize and fully acknowledge what is happening in our natural environment? Besides, isn’t our outer reality a reflection of our inner world? If Mother Earth is ailing, doesn’t that clearly tell us that we, the human species, are likewise in a similar state of dysfunction? That it is our own dysfunction that has caused and resulted to the dysfunctional state of our dear planet earth?
A guy in his 20s is sitting alone, back against the glass wall. He is well dressed, in white loafers, tailored bermudas and a black polo tee. His choice of seat allows him to have a full view of the cafe. He ordered a large sized coffee and opened his bag, revealing at least 7 books, a thick file of notes, a water bottle and some wires. He took out a calculator and began working on his homework. He kept his mobile out of sight, but he is easily distracted. Within half hour, he got up to order some bites.
And I have been doing some of that. But I was also offered the chance this last weekend to head to the Fruška gora (a country area outside of Belgrade known as the Frankish Hills, as Rebecca West says, for a reason far too dull to interest anyone). Now, this area is sort of a wide green valley filled with small country houses, Orthodox monasteries, and acre upon acre of fruit trees. Its special in Serbian history for offering a retreat from Turkish dominated territory, and to this day houses the tombs of many Kings. But I'm no Serb historian, I'm in it for the fruit! We're talking cherries of all seasons, pears, figs, grapes, plums, and all manner of sunflowers, lavender and corn. Its not the season for these yet, but Oh my G-D, it is still so insanely gorgeous.
How were they to find a replacement? Who could qualify? Of the 120 who were present, there were two who had followed the Lord during the entire three years of His ministry. They were Matthias and Barsabas. However, they needed only one and that is why they were so concerned about it.
If you’ve visited the Youtube page, then chances are, you’ll sooner or later find comments complaining about the whole dystopian future thing going on in the game. Oh, why’re they making it a dystopian game? That’s so unoriginal, hurr hurr. It doesn’t take a genius to figure out how in the wrong those kinds of punks are.
Hi!!! I am Lyn and I love soaping and making candles. Do I have enough time in my life for this?............Not really but I am going to make it LOL. My Ironing pile is proof of that!!!!!!.
James Purnell, Britain’s Work and Pensions Secretary, stepped down from Gordon Brown’s cabinet, calling on the British Prime Minister to “stand aside.”
At this power level I then switched to PSK31 mode and using my Perseus SDR I observed the IPs.
Length: 450-600 words. Please help each other copy edit. If members of your group spell names, names of streets, names of businesses differently; give me different facts; or word direct quotes in a different fashion, you will all earn a zero on this portion of the exam.
I'm already intrigued by Ana. There's an error in her DNA test. How does this happen? How does she get away with it? How does the Community find out that she'll become ill? What's the deal with the Crazies? If there wasn't an error, would she have been casted out anyway? I have so many questions about Ana's life. She sounds like a strong girl just from the blurb and I can't wait to get to know her further.
6C. Kölsch
Like everything, traveling on business has its good points and bad points. On the positive side, I get the TV all to myself and it is pretty quiet. On the negative side, I get the bed all to myself and it is pretty quiet.
Just So You Know... I know I need to get out more but the tea-party members do not wear name tags, they scare me; almost as much as clowns.
Once the seed of doubt was planted, it sprouted and began to curl, a vine of twisted truth in my mind; its tendrils pointing to the clues all around me. Like the way my oldest “brother” would pick out tunes on his hill-billy guitar, “turkey in the straw” and “stairway to heaven” shouting “How you like them apples?” My younger siblings would respond with raucous laughter and farts. Turning up my nose at the vulgarity I played the classics on my piano, “School bus stop” and “Hot Cross Buns”. I would play like the regal young lord that I was over and over again with the hopes that real music would soothe the savage beasts. To my horror, my music books were defaced with graffiti: ‘Shut up!’ and ‘You suck!’.
Hello and welcome to another challenge here at The Squirrel and The Fox - can you believe it's our twelth? How time flies!
Dabber : Lavender Sachet and Speckled Egg - All by Ranger
As you can see and hear, Henderson and his merrie band were ripping through one swampy electric blues number after another. That’s how it went the whole night. And I have to say, whether he was exhorting the crowd to ignore the Bluebird’s famous no-talking-during-songs rule or belting out another baleful tune, Henderson seemed a good deal more relaxed than any of the several times I saw him perform with The Steeldrivers. Clearly, this was his home turf and the blues was his mother tongue.
Three workshops will follow throughout the rest of the summer and into the fall. On August 15, attendees will learn how to properly integrate chickens into their gardens and how to build a chicken tractor, which is “like a small pen that the chickens go in that you put on your vegetable bed,” Ayer explained. “The chickens help the vegetable bed because they scratch it up so they prepare a nice bed for planting.”
Bring the boys out (we bring the boys out we bring the boys out yeah)
* If you're looking for something fun and creative to do with Instagram, you should join us for Curly Girl's Scavenger Hunts. We're currently on challenge #3, which is all about specific colors. You can see what I chose for challenge #1-"Inspire" and "Inspiring" on her blog too!
So we smelled gas here a few weeks ago, and got out and called the fire department. They came and checked everything out (all was well!) – but they gave us some Fireman Helmets for the kids
all sheep and oxen,
I and my friends could tell you all about the Conan, Frodo, Fafhrd and the Grey Mouser and the Cthulhu Mythos. We knew nothing about Imaro. Had we known – Charles R. Saunders would be a billionaire by now. Anyhow, being highly competitive and wanting to one-up my friends, I went to every college library that let me in (which was nearly all of them; I was the “adopted son” of many a librarian) and researched the authors of these stories (Young Readers: a library is something we visited before the introduction of the internet).
"Find ONE person that will make eye contact with you," I told my partner.
I know you are thinking that this was the right answer, it was a test, and in passing it I would, in fact, discover the diamonds packaged inside the wellies.
Wish I could come ruing to you, to feel your embrace
I was feeling dead tired by the time I met C, it had been a long and busy day. Judging by the bags she was carrying I could see that she'd been doing some serious shopping in the city and was now on her way to catch a train to wherever it was she needed to go to. She was almost like a ray of light in otherwise drab surrounding, she was well clothed, had a pleasant smile and looked as if she knew exactly what she needed to do and how she was going to do it.
got working.
That time, I was on my sophomore year. Prolly, the best year in my high school life. Yep, that’s it.
Burning Spear
It is clear from this finding that Filipino workers were discriminated upon by their employers. The Philippine government did nothing to alleviate the discrimination problem. In fact, instead of addressing the issue head on, knowing full well that a Filipino backlash can cripple the already ailing Filipino economy, the Philippine government constructed the notion of these overseas workers as being the Philippines’s Bagong Bayani or ‘new heroes’. To further add insult to injury, a quote from the article writes that Filipino overseas workers were being compared to other nationality, this time, Norwegians:
There’s nothing in this movie that will surprise you and there’s nothing in this movie that will move you. Perseus is a fisherman who’s never used a sword, so of course we have to get the training scene where the lifelong soldier embarrasses him only to have Perseus show amazing ability to pick up what he’s supposed to do and turn the tables on the guy who makes his living doing this. Gah. Every single time Perseus gives a speech you feel worse about dying for him. When the two comic relief soldiers-for-hire and weapon-makers check out, you can’t really blame them. “My dad said someday someone will have to say enough,” Perseus grumbles. “That day is today.” Good speech.
You stay while im displaced
On Sunday we went off to church and then to a kids party. It was great and the kids had lots of fun. The face painter there was extremely talented. What kid doesn't like having a bit of face painting done?!
The mission of the Ysleta del Sur Pueblo (YDSP) Community Emergency Response Team (CERT) Program is to harness the power of tribal community members through education, training and volunteer service to make our community safer, stronger and better prepared to respond to the threats of terrorism, crime, public health issues and disasters of any kind. YDSP CERT training promotes a partnering effort between tribal and city/county emergency services and the people that they serve. YDSP CERT members are encouraged to support tribal emergency response agencies by taking a more active role in emergency preparedness projects in their community. Currently, the tribe has an AmeriCorps worker who is helping with tribal recruitment as well as reaching out to the larger surrounding communities.
Farmer #2: (laughing) It sure does make all this farm work easier seeing all these healthy kids running around!
One possible channel might be through economic transition, which is exogenous to the model. Suppose the capitalist sector expanded in Bangladesh to reach a critical mass. At such point, would a politician say “a-ha, I don’t need these grubby sub-factions, I can do better by promising and delivering ‘reform’”?
Just an attempt to envision a life without any sort of should poisoned thought, just the sheer glimpse of it, brings a smile of relief on my face.
Ok, back to where I started so the fact that I get excited about another kind of ham is amazing to me, but Pratt's Ham did it for me! So, that is a new "tradition" I look forward to every year at Christmas time.
41So they went away from the Sanhedrin, happy to undergo shame for the Name.
SAMPLE ANSWER: Explain the criteria for establishing minimal facts / historical bedrock, list a set of minimal facts, explain why they pass the criteria, propose at least two naturalistic alternatives to the resurrection, and disprove them. MUST mention 1 Corinthians 15:3-7 in order to pass.
Annnnywho....can't wait to see what you guys have been up to this week! Any Valentine's projects? I have not been able to motivate myself to do them yet. It could be because I feel like we just reclaimed the house from Christmas! If it is anything like last year, I will whip something up Feb 10th!
Not duelling events, but women and spurious grudges. We men are too thick-skinned to have any idea of why a woman might seethe with resentment. Truly, we have no idea. And a short while ago, a female blogger, who I will not name nor provide any specific clues toward, seems to have become angry with me and feels that I had insulted her or harmed her in some way. I had then, and still have now, no idea what I was supposed to have done.
Also this month, I’ll be at….Dixon Place. What, again? Yes! It’s the only place I ever go these days! On February 10, 6:30pm also be participating in a panel organized by author David Freeland called The Vanishing City: Losing the Fun. It’s all about how time and time again, New York’s historic entertainment districts have fallen before the wrecking ball. Joining me on the dais will be Freeland, along with historians Andrew Dolkart and Cindy VandenBosch. I hope to see you there!
As Gates rightly said, “one of the most important changes of the last 30 years (now 35 years) is that digital technology has transformed almost everyone into an information worker.
I AM SO SORRY I HAVE BEEN SUCH A BAD BLOGGER.
The skies are grey; the towers have toppled, forming bird sanctuaries; the whole thing is further proof that architecture students could very well be the future of the entertainment industry... Films, games, novels.
@owillis: Beck turns the earth's rotation backwards, stops election of Obama
lets invite the world press,
Saturday and Sunday
Things may be quiet around here for a few weeks, but I promise to be return with much to share.
Fasting was not a command under the law. The first mention of the act is in Judges 20:26. To the Pharisee, it was a self-denial, a self-sacrifice. It is sadly ironic that so many people feel that if they do without something or put in a little extra effort, God will be appeased and they will be rewarded.
In LOTRO I found a game mired in the past, built to stop you having fun in order that you paid your subscription every month, and after eight months it broke my spirit to the point I never thought I’d enjoy another MMO. But where LOTRO is all about rationing your fun and doling out endless grind, Guild Wars 2 is entirely about fun. No monthly fees means Arenanet doesn’t need to build in artificial brakes and instead can just give you fun, glorious repeatable fun.
There is only one international criminal fraternity in the world which ‘owns’ corrupt law-enforcement agents and politicians and has it lieutenants strategically positioned at all of the above institutions, and is therefore powerful enough to help carry out such an audacious Ponzi scheme: The Zionist mafia.
Otis Redding - Live on the Sunset Strip
6x9 oil on canvas
Today is the day that I expect great things from God.
First I read the book and found it to be a very good read, with no objectionable content for my teenage daughters. The book, the first in a trilogy, is itself divided into three parts. Part I , “The Tributes”, gives the history of 16-year-old Katniss, her family, town, and the games in general; Gale, her best friend, an older boy with whom she has hunted for years; and Peeta, the bakers’ son, who will be selected as the other tribute.
1-Juicing can be done many ways with all different types of produce. My current favorite combo is what I use two to three times per week for this season including things I find at the farmers market. It’s important to understand that using foods out of season will effect your immune system, the ability to acclimate to the seasonal temperatures/climates and overall well being. Shopping at your local farmers markets will assure you have the best quality produce for your body during the current season. My choice for equipment is the Jack LaLanne Juicer…had mine for over 10 years now and it’s still a champ!!!
cardigan- target
I ended Mother’s Day this year by doing one of my favourite things. Watching my kids play together and taking candid photos of them while they did. I took hundreds of pictures (as I do) and there is not a single one I did not love. It is rare that this happens, but the light was so perfect and it made me so happy to see my kids so completely engaged in playing with each other, outside. For about an hour, pebbles and “leaf boat” races were every bit as intriguing as iPods and laptops. All the silly stresses and irritations (why does the least bad behaviour feel like a personal insult on Mother’s Day?) fall away, and I can just enjoy how sublime these little spirits are. Here is a random sampling of the pictures I will treasure forever….
in this colourful field
Let it ferment 12-15 hours.
1/4 tsp. onion juice
You can change your look totally with the change and selection of your hairstyle.We have an grteat varities in the selection of prom night hairstyles.We have an prom night hairstyles for long hair,prom hairstyles for long hair as well as prom hair style for medium hair.Also these hair styles varies in styles like prom updos hairstyle or prom down hairstyle.Here i have did a very little effort to bring some short hairstyle for prom night or short prom hairstyles prom hair styles for short hair.
You know what you believe
For the next 5 years or so, social media marketing maniacs will be hitting us over the head with the new poster child of social media marketing -- the Old Spice campaign. Like them, I believe this campaign is terrific and will continue to be extremely successful. However, there are two things we need to remember about it:
Human rights are there for everyone. People demand we codify these with laws and legislation. We might not like what someone chooses to own or how they choose to live their life, but that doesn't mean we should deny them the chance to do so. If you don't stand up for what someone else believes in, how can you ask them to stand up for what you do?
2. Elizabeth at 217 Creations-I love her distressed and inked style. Even if I don't emulate it much, I do like to see what she's up to.
Next we come to Hudson's room. It usually looks like a Lego bomb went off in there. I highly recommend wearing shoes at all times in this room. Navigating the floor barefoot is like walking across a minefield. I can't even count the number of times I've stepped on one of those damn things this week alone. And yes, he's supposed to clean his room everyday...this mess is a fresh one, even though it looks the exact same as yesterday's mess.
Why does Richard Branson keep invading his daughter’s privacy by publishing snaps of her wedding? It’s not as if Holly or her new husband Freddie Andrewes are even public figures.
Christopher Nyerges of the Eagle Rock School of Self-Reliance in California was recently featured as a forager in the LA Times. Because of his foraging, Nyerges is “convinced I will never go hungry, I'll never be homeless, I'll never be broke.” All of which sound pretty good to me.
A father who has Plans. Don’t all fathers? Grace’s does, at least. And Grace agrees with them. Except . . .
Firefighters remained on the scene until the early morning putting out hot spots and assessing damage.
But, imports from overseas get a tax-free ride, coming into the American market without federal taxes.
“People trapped in the Swat conflict zone face a humanitarian catastrophe unless the Pakistani military immediately lifts a curfew that has been in place continuously for the last week,” Brad Adams, HRW’s Asia director, said in a statement on 26 May.
I hate hate. I hate the hating haters who don't hate hate like me. Kill the hating haters! Sterilize the hating haters, then kill them and desecrate their graves and dig them up and hate them for hating like that.
Funkwerks - Funkwerks is a new brewery located in a building that used to house the Fort Collins Brewery. Brad and Gordon just started bottling in early 2011 and focus on organically brewed farmhouse ales. Their Saisons, Wits and Biere di Gardes are worth the trip even if you're not a Belgian nut.
by low cloud and light pollution;
Dulce et Decorum Est
It was a BOX OF SUNSHINE!!!!!
Miss C: Can I be a woman robot?
Recently my husband and I have really been into homemade food. Since it’s s difficult and sometimes very expensive to buy some of our favorite foods here in Jakarta we have been experimenting with different recipes. We now make our own yogurt, dill pickles, granola and cured salmon.
Alexis is an even bigger cow in this book, and I'm so surprised that Callie put up with all her crap.
Paper: marina mist, soft sky (SU), heavenly white (PaperTemptres), designer paper (MME)
I decided to make something other than a card for my DT piece this week, so I've made a Post It Note holder.
"Telling our kids" is one thing, but "living by example" is another, and in my mind, a more powerful way of getting an important message through to them.
has become and EAD Designs
I am not so sure what the weather wants to do lately.
Hand me a paper bag?
J. S. Bach’s two surviving settings of the Passion story are pillars of Western art music. The emotional intensity and directness of Bach’s setting of St. John the Evangelist’s text has been the subject of much musicological discussion in recent years. As she did for her Grammy-nominated recording of Bach’s Orchestral Suites, Monica Huggett will reexamine the original, more intimate scoring of this work, dating from 1724.
(Making up-to-date PowerPoints for presentations)
I have been thinking a bit of the school of thought commonly known as "Pragmatism." Is it simple as the, (as they say) "if it ain't broke don't fix it" or perhaps the "keep it simple stupid" doctrine(s) (which reminds me a bit of a very simple version of what is known as "Ockham's Razor), or is it a bit more complicated than that? Would a rather technical question be appropriate even? For instance, would most students be better served if a school district geared their curriculum more toward career training with less emphasis on "college prep?" It can't be argued that for a great many students, learning the art of AC and Heating is more "real" world and useful than all the reading and dissection of A Mid Summer Night's Dream could ever possibly be. Anyone who has tried to help students get through English literature notices the glazed over eyes that most students develop. For many, it would seem, learning auto mechanics would tend to be the "pragmatic"course. Probably, this push for a "pre college" curriculum is detrimental for the greater majority of students; but how does the system serve the needs of both the college bound and those more practical? What would be "pragmatic?"
Seriously, this book is so fast paced you might get whiplash. Carey is very adept at keeping the story clicking along and he keeps the myriad of plot points in the air while they slowly coalesce and make more sense as things go forward. My instinct is to name the prose enjoyable and workmanlike, but I feel that last description is unfair. Since Carey seems to have an uncanny knack of finding interesting ways of working things and crafting sentences that are only disguised as workmanlike and would better belong in an English Lit class taught by Alan Moore or Warren Ellis.
Deputy Richard Boyd Barrett: ￼ ￼ Not flat taxes.
Beltaine is one of the eight cycles of the wheel that is honoured in Feminine Mysticism. Beltaine dates back to paganistic times but is not confined to paganistic practices. In Feminine Mysticism we seek out the Divine in all that we do, both internally and externally, the ceremony and ritual that is sacred to the eight cycles of the wheel are physical enactments of Divine occurrences. The ceremony and ritual that are held during this time of Beltaine are wrought with metaphorical portrayals of the Divine’s ability to influence us in our human experience while we are here on Earth. In times past on the eve of Beltaine a great community fire was lit, all other fires in the house were extinguished and one great fire rose up in majesty, proclaiming to all that the fire of the Sun was truly returned and here to stay. This one great light proclaimed that fire would warm the hearth, light the fires in the wombs of wombyn looking to conceive, light the ambitious path of the adventurers and offer protection and power to the children of the community. We know today that the fire is a symbol of the Creators warmth, protection, guidance and life-giving gifts, the actual building of and lighting of the fire is the physical representation of those qualities. To be able to embody our worship and reverence while in a human form offers a sense of intimate connection to our Creator, our ancestors knew this and found as many opportunities to engage in this type of worship as they could. As we look around us at the life that is in full bloom, ripe, fragrant, delicate and enchanting we begin to tap into the energy that surrounds us during this season. Beltaine is the peak of fertility and life abundant. In days of old the men and wombyn would make love in the fields, using their bodies as vessels for the Divine Masculine to merge with the Divine Feminine, in this merging of two into one they believed they were aiding the Earth in her ability to bear fruit and crops as well as increase their own personal chances for fertility. To practice Beltaine rituals from a Mystical perspective we simply tweak our intent, we do not seek to influence the Earth who has a wisdom of her own, we trust that the Divine already IS and instead intend to tap into and experience the abundance of this fertile, abundant energy, perhaps through two bodied merging and perhaps not. On this day there are many forms of experiencing the merging of Feminine and Masculine, both internally and externally.
Leonardo also makes an excellent dessert wine:
You’ve written a lot, from short stories to novels. What’s your favourite book or story from all that you’ve written?
Well, I made these quite a while ago, but it seems I never got around to posting about them. My apologies.
Yay, Lex is on screen!
For my part, it's been a rough and tiring day on a tight schedule. I try to capture images of all participants but find it difficult to keep up with all three disciplines being performed at the same time. There's a lot of chopping and changing in the shooting and although I would like to spend more time with certain gymnasts I don't think it's particularly fair on the others. I try to use my photography also as a form of encouragement for the youngsters, and judging by the feedback I receive I seem to be doing fairly well. I do notice though that the quality of composition suffers occasionally, because I'm not fully focussed on single situations.
We would take the occasional water and bathroom breaks, but would practice in that room all day long. My most vivid memory is peaking out of the room at about 2am both of us wrapped in the shabby avocado green blanket his mom sent from home, opening the front door, and watching all the kids stumble home from the bars. It was reading day and everyone was out partying but we were in touching, caressing, and learning how to please one another.
Oh yes… indeed. It is wealthy beyond imagination. But not because it holds dollars. Again, the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report shows that government holds many trillions of dollars worth of everything but dollars – real estate, stock investments, all foreign currencies, banks, General Motors, and many many government owned corporations both national and international. One pension fund alone held over $1 billion dollars in just Chevron Corporation stock at market value, and there are thousands and thousands of these funds! The Social Security Fund is sitting at over 2.5 trillion dollars in investments.
We have had several hard frosts in the last week. Putting a bucket over tulips hopefully has saved the late spring bloomers from certain death. Central New York has many apple farmers, and they have been putting in long hours with smudge pots and big fans hoping to save their apple blossoms from the nefarious freezing temperatures. Fingers crossed for them!
Meanwhile, out in the universe, the Guardians of Oa, a blue-skinned Yoda-like race, have created the Green Lantern Corps, a sort of cosmic Interpol. Each Green Lantern derives his power from the green light of willpower, which is channeled through their ring and allows them to convert thought to matter. They are given a sector of the universe to patrol.
2. Skim for and circle key words and concepts from the article. Which vocabulary words are fabulous? confusing?
Tobacco prohibitionists will also routinely and triumphantly proclaim”There is NO right to smoke” as if this were the only logical end of any debate on the subject. This statement is absolutely correct of course. Smoking is NOT a right.
Scene: The Park !
Organic Gardening
A great example of a very short and to-the-point mission state­ment is Ford’s:
Who collects veg. cookbooks for his patients
texture, it doesn’t really matter if it sinks. My favorite bit is getting
One of my resolutions was to lose 5 lbs per month for the next 8-10 months. I know I can surpass this pretty easily, but I wanted to keep it completely attainable so I wouldn't get discouraged. It is January 21, and in the last 18 days, I have lost 5 lbs. I am already ahead of schedule! I have been working out and doing cardio (the goal is 3 times a week, I've done two this week, plus tomorrow), and doing yoga 1 or 2 times a week (tonight). I have been eating better, and less, and keeping a food journal.
Jackie Washington was born in Ontario in 1919 and began performing at age 5, singing with The 4 Washington Brothers (the other 3 being his brothers Ormsby, Harold & Doc). By the early 60’s he had started playing folk music and made his way to Greenwich Village, signing soon after with Vanguard Records and appearing on their 1961 compilation New Folks (along with the Greenbriar Boys, Hedy West & David Gude). His first, self-titled solo album appeared in 1962. This was his 4th album and the last of his 1960s recordings. If you want more info on his Vanguard years, you can see a pretty complete discography of that era here.
“Won’t that be hugely inefficient and expensive?”
I am going to guess my weight to be approx. 450 lbs .. I have no way to weight myself so I will have to go off what I weighted last time I did and how much I think I might have gained…
Strain the egg yolks through a medium sieve into a large mixing bowl to remove the chalazae (those repugnant, curled little white cords that attach the yolk to the shell). Add the sugar, salt, and nutmeg. Whisk gently to combine.
so as to fit
BaseRunning
Also it was the dollars of the Mormon Church that was behind Prop. 8 in California to ban rights to the gay population, so they ,as Mitt has already shown, do agree on that, as well. Only the Republican Party who are heavily Evangelical backed still refuse to understand that all Americans are endowed with the same rights and that Religion should play no role in denying any rights to any American citizen. The churches can refuse to marry in their own Church but they have no power to eliminate those rights to Civil marriages. To do so is unconstitutional on their part. Every State that has tried deny civil rights to any American will find their law contested in the Supreme Court eventually. The Constitution is very clear on civil rights of all Americans over religious convictions.
I came across a new audio podcast series this morning and downloaded it so I could replay some of the episodes during my morning walk with Amy. It is called "Titanic Letters" and has been produced by BBC Radio Ulster to coincide with the 100th anniversary of the sinking of the Titanic. The format is delightfully simple : each short programme (two or three minutes on average) features a reading of a letter sent by someone on the maiden voyage of the Titanic or someone associated with the ship. Following each reading we are told the fate of the writer. It is podcasting at its best and all 43 short episodes can be accessed on the BBC website - you don't need an MP3 player, you can listen to them via your computer if you wish.
Paper: always artichoke, lucky limeaid, whisper white ballet blue, Michaels paper
"I'm insane?! I'm insane!? It's you who can't provide the evidence!" he retorts.
“Ham sandwich, coke.” He went to the park the next day looking forward to being able to order a
I wanted something that had a lot of pockets and places to tuck the things that I collect when I travel. And I liked the idea of a fabric journal for travel since it's lightweight and would be easy to pack.
Anyway, those are my immediate reactions. I've got to get out soon to see Slumdog, and hopefully Frost/Nixon will get here this weekend, though I'm generally allergic to Ron Howard (with the exception of Arrested Development). Revolutionary Road was a devastating book, and in Mendes' hands, promises a pretty dark cinematic treatment as well. I'd like to see The Reader, because I'm a sucker for Ralph Finnes and period pieces, but Benjamin Button is still leaving me kind of cold, even though I typically like Fincher's work. Maybe it's the Pitt effect. I just can't take him seriously.
It’s an amazing book. Lord sat for Giacometti for two weeks and each day he’d write an account of his time there, and Giacometti’s like a moth in the studio—he moves from painting to sculpture, and is there for a bit, and then from sculpture to writing, and scribbles for a bit. I’m not saying that’s me, but that willingness—stylistically—has some aspect of how I think about things. Just in terms of style itself, specifically, piece by piece: the places in which these were published had very different formal requirements, which has something to do with things reading as they do.
Goose: That's not the only thing you're blowing.
HAPPY WRITING.
When you first hear the word eight, what thoughts come to mind? Take a moment and think of three words that you associate with the number eight.
An article last week in The Wall Street Journal gives us some insight into how they have made their Apple stores into a retail juggernaut. More people visit Apple stores in a quarter than visit the four largest Disney amusement parks in a year.
Brown sweater, Express. Turquoise/green/brown dress, Forever 21. Brown tank (beneath dress), Forever 21. Dark jeans, Express. Brown booties, Style & Co. Necklace of stone and silver, Bellis Fair mall. Brown headband, Claire's Boutique.
I love when HE plays with my nipples although I don’t care to do it so much to myself, but I tried, mostly closing my eyes, listening to the men talk dirty to the woman in deep french accents. I imagined they were talking to me, they were taking me, anyone but him. It was taking awhile, but I was persistent, my legs spread, the covers pulled up to my neck. My right hand between my thighs, my left clutching a breast. I was close, so close.
If you didn't see in the last post, Jake and I are finally in Escrow on our house! We should move in my mid to late October! Our home inspection is this Monday at 3 pm. I have a list of everything that the inspector should cover, just to be sure that everything gets checked out. Luckily with the type of loan we are getting, we have to have almost like 2 home inspections. The second one is more of an appraisal, but he'll cover a lot of the same things the first inspector covers. I really can't wait to move in and get Jaxon's room all set up for him. I think this is the perfect first house for us. It's just big enough for us to grow into for many years, but it's not so big that we don't know what to do with it all. It also is move-in ready but has several different projects that Jake and I would like to do to make it more "us". But what matters the most is that it's a great place for Jaxon to grow up. It's safe with some of the best schools in all of California and there is plenty for us to do. I think when he grows up he'll be really happy that we chose this as a place for him to grow up in.
How else could you pray but with the Spirit? We see more confirmation in Ephesians 6:18.
Experience Timeline
D) Eva also goes by the moniker "The Vanilla Gorilla".
"God save a drowning man"
Tip #3. You will regret this one day.
ps the photos were taken in the soho shabby chic store - i love the inspiration board. rachell ashwell's company (another brit) had some financial woes last year, but worked them out and is thankfully back in the game. more store pics here, including some flirty prom dresses.
Article 66: Proved that the first Defendant has professional experience and is of adult age;
I guess I'll find out tonight!
At our Lamaze class we were told to toss all birth plans out the window, which we have known for a while now. The only exception we have is, ‘give us the epidural’. We understand depending on the given situation, the doctor will make our birth plan. But we also know we don’t want to embrace the old football slogan, “No pain, No gain”. In fact, it’s the complete opposite. It’s more like “No Pain, Or it’s not happening”. Well not really, but we do want our name on the list for an epidural right under the paper that checks us in. Fingers-crossed that our close friend Julie will be working in L&D that night, to keep an extra eye on us. Fingers-crossed our amazing photographer/close friend will be able to be there, to capture all the amazing and emotional moments. Fingers-crossed we get that midwife that we absolutely want to be there to catch the baby. Fingers-crossed a lot of things, but we know the game plan is an audible play and our birth plans may be tossed to the side or out all together.
This Navy varied stripe is the ultimate-CooL, & we can all be CooL when we decorate with a Stripe in the Herrera Style.
Chase does an ultrasound on Emily to check her kidneys and then she coughs up blood. Of course. It’s even better when it’s a kid, right? Simon is not satisfied with the care Emily is receiving so he wants to move her to Mercy but they talk him out of it. The team thinks Emily has a clot from the fall from the carousel.
So, yeah, those are the main reasons I’ve hated anything book related the past couple of months. But this past week I’ve felt myself coming out of it. I’ve read three books and loved each one. And I’ve decided that I would continue book blogging, but will be taking a bit of a different approach to it, for my own sanity.
Anyway...if I ever were to actually make it past Chapter 11 in the book of Genesis, I would be able to read the the story of Abraham and Isaac again. Every time this particular story comes up in a Bible study or a sermon or Sunday school, I freak out. What are the chances that I am marching my kid up a mountain, getting a fire going and tying my kid to the altar to sacrifice him? And when little Johnny says "where is the lamb for the sacrifice?", what are the chances that I am going to say "don't worry, little Johnny. God will be providing that shortly. In the meantime, hop up here on this pile of sticks and hang out while I light them on fire." I can tell you the chances - ZERO! Now the reason I am so disturbed by this is because I realize this makes me not only unwilling to sacrifice something I love, but I am also pretty sure I would disobey a direct order from God. I like to think I would be obedient if God were to appear before me and issue a direct command, but I certainly can't say with any conviction that I would gather my kid and my fire and head out the door.
here’s the ‘back’ of the sketchbook with the necessary barcode. i wonder if they will be able to scan the code. better get out the iron and try to clean it up.
The German word "volk" means "people" with certain racial connotations. Humboldt believed that the character of the volk is shaped by geography and climate so that man becomes indigenous to his own environment. As the 1800s progressed, the racial element became more and more emphasized by many German thinkers along with a nationalistic view of the land itself. When this concoction mixed with evolutionary theory, an Aryan Social Darwinism was born, which later became the biological bread and butter of National Socialism. By the early 1900s, race, indigenous ethnicity, and a love for nature became very popular in German culture, especially among the wandervogels.
Markers: Blush Blossom, Blushing Bride, Wild Wasabi, Close to Cocoa, Not Quite Navy, River Rock and Gelly Roll Pen
In 2009, Khai moved to New York to assume the duties of Worldwide Chief Creative Officer and Chairman of the Worldwide Creative Council at Ogilvy & Mather.
It rained but the crowd still turned up. Catch the beautiful scenery of Sentosa, cable car, the cruise ships and Vivocity while walking. To seek shelter from the rain, use the covered walkway. Best of all, there are escalators. Yes, you lazy bum, you.
ANNAPOLIS, MARYLAND John Boehner was visibly not impressed with this weekend's box office opening of Russell Brand's new family movie "Hop". Despite the House Speaker's feelings about the film, "Hop" debuted at No. 1.
"Appearance" itself belongs to reality: it is a form of its being; i.e., in a world where there is no being, a certain calculable world of identical cases must first be created through appearance: a tempo at which observation and comparison are possible, etc.
and many more…..
As with many others who suffer from depression, I think it probably comes down to the fact that behind a microphone, or in front of a camera, you can lose yourself entirely and immerse yourself in another world, the world of your words that's far more real than the one that confronts you every day full of shadows and terrors and the confusion of other people and what to say to them or how to filter out the countless streams of data pouring into your senses without turning and running into a corner and clapping your hands over your ears - because you can't, this fake world, the one with other people and conversations and community and all those other monsters that haunt your sleepless nights and watchful days, this is the world you have to carve a path in, earn the money to keep yourself off the streets in. But when those people you find so frightening and confusing are buffered from you by a microphone, it's like you have this gloriously comforting blanket thrown around you. The noise that bombards you is gone. It's just you. and that wonderful world of your words . The real world where you wish you could live. And for those three minutes when you're in front of the crowd, you can live there.
(Clark Faville)
We talked quietly about where she needed to go and that I would walk her as far as she needed and which direction that was going to be. She was headed the same direction as I was and so we walked till we were no longer followed and stopped so she could retrieve her mace and walk the rest of the way home in the comfort of her solace.
For nearly the past fifteen years or so… I have had a nice little woodworking hobby…
and blades are shining,
During meetings, attendees share the physical, emotional and spiritual struggles felt during the loss of a child. There is no pressure to participate in the discussion. The privacy of all attendees is respected. The support group has no religious affiliation, however religious beliefs and values may be discussed.
The Final Conflict: The Last Days of God (Displeased Records 2009 - European Version)
The only times where they haven’t been on the good groove is when I’ve allowed someone else’s energy to affect my own.
- BLT with thick cut bacon, heirloom tomato, and mascarpone spread
Now, I KNOW all this. I also know a lot about testing, about criterion vs. standardized testing, about predictive value, and about what Republican assfaces the State Board of Education are. I would never, NEVER, emphasize TAKS as a reason to make - oh, any decisions whatsoever, PARTICULARLY not making it the sole criteria regarding retention in the third or fifth grade. It's stupid to do so, and that's all there is to it.
As it gets warmer, I feel less like layering my clothes. This turns most outfits into just a shirt and pants. Not sure if anyone is really interested in seeing that? I know that in addition to ideas about styling outfits, I love to see the good deals that other WIWWers have found. So I guess I will keep plugging away!
Here, in any event, is the unabridged version of the Index prepared four years ago for The Bible: Respectful Readings (Lexington Books, 2008).
With the fizz and its dark brown colouring its similar looking to Coke, plus a head.
Yeah, the kid will be all right.
“Everyone knows that only a small fraction of juvenile salmon survive to return as adults,” said study co-author Dr. Mark Lewis. “The fish-farm sea lice are reducing that fraction even more.”
I’d convince Americans that Europe has it right, and America has it wrong.
Readmore »»
I offer Matthew 5:43-45: “Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, and hate thine enemy. But I say unto you, Love your enemies, bless them that curse you, do good to them that hate you, and pray for them which despitefully use you, and persecute you; That ye may be the children of your Father which is in heaven: for he maketh his sun to rise on the evil and on the good, and sendeth rain on the just and on the unjust.”
5: Mt. Rushmore
Admittedly, I'm not sure I'd like to be some design whizz like Joseph Altuzarra (who, I may or may not have a tiny tiny crush on). The idea of playing with monkey fur is.... a bit... erm... repellent.
To thank you for visiting my blog and for hopping along with us, I am giving away the My Pink Stamper set "Love-alicious".
Now, back to the beginning: Everything you have or will read is false, including this. Or not.
This blog is not to be confused with a run of the mill street faces photo roll. Like style and good taste, it is not necessarily age exclusive, nor is it dictated by fad trends, genericness and safety.
After arriving at her apartment, Jane turned to me and said,
Ways of Increasing Knowledge and Abolishing Ignorance:
In Defense of Exclusion - Sometimes it's nice to be with people who are like you. It's nice to be around people who get your kink, your fetish - to be somewhere that you don't have to explain it to.
Toasted white sesame oil
We've tried to punish Myanmar's military government for human rights abuses by cutting off trade possibilities for its people. If sanctions were lifted, could U.S. companies and local citizens both benefit? If we stopped insisting on isolating the already-isolated military government, might their methods gradually soften? I don't know for sure, but if what you've been doing has spent decades not working, isn't it time to try something else?
We had been there about 2 hours and things were going fine.
IN ETERNAL PEACE.
I fucking love Louis de Bernières. Proper love. I would lick his unwashed balls on a hot and sweaty day, with gusto.
If it's anything like earlier launches, it will be loads of fun. I'll be dressing up in line with the 1945 theme. The beer is from February 1945, so my Stalin costume is totally appropriate. I've been practising the icy glare to get the characterisation spot on. The moustache is already grown (certainly good for attracting attention on the tram!).
This particular message is what I told you it would be. You may call it The Recalibration of Knowledge on the Planet. Unknowing to you, and very slowly, a softening is taking place, moving the energy of the planet more from the masculine to the feminine. That is to say, it is balancing what was unbalanced. North and South are coming together hemispherically, so that there’s no longer a macho Northern hemisphere, but rather one which is balanced. It has to happen this way for Africa to do what it’s going to do. (predictions ahead)
NL Holdem Basics Video 1
B5. R.R.O.R.
If you have any favorite transional songs or poems, get quiet quickly chants, or a management technique you could not get through your week without I would love to hear them!! I am probably more ready for "new" than they are!! : )
Here is the vital information to gather from this post: I’m happier with my marriage than I am with our wedding. I’m learning to be ok with this because ultimately, that is all that matters. Yet there is evidence that remains, in the form of wedding pictures and they haunt me.
Authorities: Abortion doctors charged with murderWASHINGTON (AP) — Two out-of-state doctors who traveled to Maryland to perform late-term abortions have been arrested and charged with multiple counts of murder under the state’s viable fetus law, authorities said.
Q1: Some people claim Australia is becoming a ‘nanny state’ where there is too much government intervention and control in people’s day to day lives. Do you agree or disagree that Australia is becoming a ‘nanny state’?
4. What is your most favorite smell?
I started out my year with a bang, traveling and doing as much as I possibly could all the time. If there was an opportunity, I seized it. If there was an impromptu trip that I could afford, I did it. I have no regrets from this year as far as fun goes. I got to experience Mardi Gras with the locals on the Gulf Coast. I flew to see my girlfriend in Florida just because I could. I watched the last space shuttle launch off the Atlantic coast and I've burned in the hot sun of the Gulf. I spent my year making memories with my best girls and my wonderful family.
The Christmas Child ... TBN ... 4 AM
Fill the glasses and place in the refrigerator.
Furthermore, the vast majority of Sanitation workers were doing the best that they could under the circumstances, although even some of the best equipped plows were getting stuck because of the severe conditions - the level of personnel and equipment was commensurate with levels of recent significant storms. Although there were reports of trucks driving with raised plows, most of the reported incidents that were captured on film were circumstances where the plows were supposed to be up, and DSNY is looking into the few instances where plows appeared to be improperly raised.
The Law, Public Safety, Correction, and Security Pathway will be offered to next year’s freshmen and sophomores. The class will be known as Intro to LPSCS and will be one-half a credit. In the following years, Law Enforcement 1, Law Enforcement 2 and an internship class for the pathway will be offered in consecutive order. The internship class may be held off for a year or two.
Miles this week: 2
After my marriage in Bangalore we headed off to Hyderabad. Mum and Dad lived there and it is customary for newly weds to visit the bridegroom’s parents soon after the wedding. We spent five days in Hyderabad jam-packed with activities, another reception followed by visits to close family and friends.
What a vile film this is. What a complete and utter failure. I don't even know where to start. The shoestring budget? The lack of any likable characters? The godawful acting? A blank, empty line would sum up everything this pile of ass did right, and for what it did wrong I'd have to write several paragraphs of this kind of raving. So let's just...go ahead and try to get this over with, lest it haunt my nightmares forever.
See you tomorrow
However, as far as I can tell, no neo-Nazis have been knowingly invited to the Aarhus event. I don’t read Danish very well, so it’s hard to learn details about what’s happening. The demonstration will be an open one and anyone can attend. Thus it’s always possible that provocateurs could be injected into the mix to discredit our cause, as has unfortunately occurred at some EDL demos.
makes two medium loaves
I promised you that I would mention a challenge for marketers, so here it is…
Tired of gauging my obedience to someone else’s calling.
"I found this in my taxi,I thought you would like it back"
Rich in texture, colour, shape and even sound.
The creator of the Marathon Twitterthon, Milano City Marathon, launched the first Message of Hope on March 19. The BMO Vancouver Marathon received its Message of Hope from Easter Island Marathon and we passed on our own message to Maratón Internacional de Pacasmayo in Peru.
“Great to have what you want. Awesome to want what you have.”
I drove into town as fast as I could and stayed at their house with the grandkids until around 4:00 when they got back from the ER. She had a mild concussion and contusions, but nothing broken. Whew.
defending my right to slaughter.
Anyway, that is my 2 cents, although it might not be worth even that much! LOL However you decide to store food, it will bless your life to have it. When people feel safe and secure they are better able to function in their everyday lives and they are happier.
7. Toss all the fruit together in your watermelon basket and you are all set! (I placed the kiwi slices on top and did not toss them in because they are more delicate.) You can also serve this with a fruit dip, like this Irish Cream Fruit Dip. If you have any leftover strawberries and blueberries, these Red, White, and Blue Berries are perfect for upcoming 4th of July parties. Enjoy!
I chose a pear as they are a happy fruit and have character. They also challenge the shading and change in color. I also did a mixture of color for the background.
we provide a sense of reality
But SURELY there'd be some quick fix or advice on the Apple website, right?
P.S. Remember that couple who invited 200 people to their wedding in Barbados I wrote about. They thought maybe 80 people would fly Mother’s Day weekend to their wedding and in the end 180 RSVP’d yes. Everyone had a wonderful time, but the couple’s budget ended up being a lot bigger than they had planned.
This year, ETCM and other Japanese makes are facing a new kind of challenge production disruption as a result of the earthquake that hit Japan in March. On top of this, the recently amended Hire-Purchase Act 1967 (HPA) that took effect on June 15 is also causing a slowdown in vehicle registrations for all car companies.
I looked toward the referee's kids - sat on a blanket, drinking out of plastic beakers to the side of the pitch. If I wasn't mistaken they were feeding themselves from a Tupperware container. They were no more than seven or eight years old, sitting with who I presumed to be their mother. She couldn't have more than thirty-five; no crime in itself, but the referee, with what hair he had left, growing white from the back of his head, was sixty if he was a day. Not that the age gap was objectionable, just from my maudlin perspective she faced a significant chunk of her life without him. Today, the sun shone brightly; and tonight, perhaps during the slower bits of Casualty, there was time to discuss the complexities of the offside rule together, but what about tomorrow? Are there rainy days spent alone on the horizon? Frankly, I should have been more preoccupied with imposing a pressing game higher up the pitch, but playing in the heat always gets to me this way.
So, on a 70-day journey the Olympic Torch spends three hours in Dumfries and Galloway. All before 10am on work and school days. I shall put that, together with my tickets for the wrestling, in my pipe and smoke it. Thank you, Lord Coe.
my closet is full ! lol
The exchange continued:
Brooke Brownkowski was tragically killed in a car accident two years later at such a young age, but had a lasting impact on so many people in her short life. She is my inspiration.
You could hear a slight undertone of remembered stress and humor as she related tales of thunderstorms lasting for hours in the afternoons and the lack of electricity which forced her to “get away from Cyberspace” and “go look at the real world”. During her stay, Yuan taught an English class to young girls in Cambodia and came up with several subjects to increase their knowledge of the world around them, including “World History and Famous People”, “Antonyms and Synonyms”, and the ever popular subject of whether or not they should “have boyfriends on campus.” She even taught them songs like “Big Big World” and “My Heart Will Go On” (They were particularly fond of Titanic). In addition, Yuan learned that many of the girls she taught hadn’t been exposed to the “difficult past of their own country”. In order to better understand and teach these girls, Yuan visited a Holocaust camp where she did academic research on Khmer Rouge Genocide. Not only did she learn a lot of history here, she was also able to find out information about why the girls hadn’t been informed about their cultural history. As it turns out, the textbook containing all the information necessary about Cambodian culture and history was readily available. However, it was not made available to these specific girls because of issues like teacher qualification and salary.
The next thing that I noticed that lined up with something the book mentioned was how there are pictures of “important” sights to see in the town. In doing this you give the map a realistic feel instead of just 2 dimensional symbols. The book states, “you give the area a cheery image with tiny pictorial symbols” (Monmonier, 66), and that is exactly the vibe I get from this map.
I felt swamped by negativity. Yet again, I was in the wrong place at the wrong time. Or the right place at the wrong time. Either way, any hope I may have been harbouring about making a (modest) living from my writing was clearly an illusion. Who the Hell did I think I was?
Premium Pale and Golden Lagers
Now owned by the National Trust as a tea shop, by the time I arrive at Bridge Cottage the staff are closing up, which means that only a few lingering day trippers remain and the lane down to Flatford Mill is peaceful and feeling almost timeless. A setting perfectly befitting the splendid buildings either side: the mullion-windowed Valley Farmhouse, dating from the Tudor period; and Granary Barn, whose roses climb up its dark timber cladding almost to the thatched roof. At the end of the lane, Flatford Mill itself, part brick, part weatherboarded, with round arched windows encircled by roses, wisteria and honeysuckle. Built in 1733, the lease was taken on by Golding Constable, John’s father, in 1765. The Constable family initially lived at the Mill but by the time of John’s birth in 1776, had moved to East Bergholt. Now owned by the National Trust, the Mill (and its associated buildings including Valley Farmhouse) are leased to the Field Studies Council as a base for arts and environmental courses.
Attempting to sound dignified at all when one sounds like an 80 yr old ajuma is impossible in front of 8 year olds. This sucks. Immune system down, the Cold wins a major battle and captures my voice and most of my energy.
Product Life Cycle Graph. The next step in the analysis is to construct a product life-cycle graph based on the information from the Product Line Metrics Matrix.
Weight: 21lbs/1oz. (she's tall & lean, a good combo)
See you at the top.
- When Spanish is spoken rapidly, B and V can often sound the same to a foreigner, although this is less applicable in Peru than in other countries such as Mexico (in my opinion). So a quick ¨por favor¨ might sound somewhat like ¨por fabor¨ instead.
one of the pieces of advice i got over and over
Do you have an extra set of eye-glasses that are current in prescription?
NOTE: This is limited to the first 20,000 cards a day so if you missed out today just make your card, save it, and try again tomorrow. Don’t forget to see my post for another FREE card from treat.com.
2. Which players have you enjoyed watching most in a Stoke shirt? Also who have been the worst signings we have made (I know this could potentially be a long list!) in either terms of value for money or failing to live up to expectations?
When Minister Maite Nkoana-Mashabane was asked whether South Africa was helping Gaddafi she said: “I am amazed at any insinuation of South Africa aiding anyone… he had not asked for asylum in South Africa and indicated some time ago that he did not intend doing so…we know for sure he will not come here." – (Source)
They allowed people to get into the water and swim around up until the 1970's.
I also debuted a cosplay myself! I was a very rare cosplay and it was a big hit. And I scared many little children, which is not a first for me. Can you guess who I am? Some people at WonderCon got it wrong! Here’s a hint. I’m a fighter! Abandon all hope!
Seven days start me over
She spasmed, and Rel jerked back as she curled tight, letting out a prehuman howl. The black fringe of the barely-restrained Axtli moved with her.
Support for the new Professorship comes from leading philanthropic individuals and trusts including The R and S Cohen Foundation, the Blavatnik Family Foundation, the Atkin Foundation, the Pears Foundation, the Gerald Ronson Foundation and Lord Weidenfeld, who took the initiative in the establishment of the Chair.
Essential Viewing:
I had some fun making this I was thinking it would look lovely on my front door, but alas no. So I thought I would make another one when I get some pennies, this one however will not be waisted I am sure. I will be popping this into my folksy shop with any luck some one will love it LOTS enough to buy it ha ha so pop by later if you would like a nosey.
My faith goes untested
As I did for the other four girls of the card line
AccuWeather.com had issued WIND ADVISORY for the two days before our journey, and we all looked for rain in the forecast, but the resulting storm that night was minor, and we fortunately saw no winter event on our trek.
I cut out 11 pentagons, then found the middle of each side, connected the dots to create yet another pentagon inside all 11 original pentagons. then folded down the sides, to create little stars inside the pentagons.
Then when I opened my facebook an old flame sent me a message. I kept seeing his name at my facebook sidebar but I couldn’t add him because I still feel guilty for what I did to him. Well, I had the courage the other day. He quickly accepted and even asked me: “Hi! How are you?” I replied, “I’m fat, thank you. How about you?” Maybe he’d reply tomorrow. Whatever it is he’s gonna say, I assume we’re okay now. He probably forgot the past already and I am probably the only one holding a grudge against myself. After all, decades have passed. Maybe it’s the same with the others.
I have also fallen back in love again with Lush’s Ultrabalm. It’s a petroleum free balm that works like (or better than) Vaseline. I have massive hay fever right now and have been blowing my nose every 5 minutes, it feels like it anyways, and this is saving my skin! I like it best of all because I know it won’t block my pores and break me out. It’s full of jojoba oil, which mimics the skins natural oils and it’s completely vegan if you care (by the turkey cooking above you know that’s not me, but I do take care to buy only products that do not test on animals).
Together myself, Dan, Sally and Dave were so overwhelmed by ours and our family’s experiences and the positive affects that both Aaron and Danielle gained from swimming with dolphins that we also want to help other families to experience what we have.
The number of pubs, on the other hand, has fallen year after year since 2007, when the smoking ban came in. Nobody—other than the terminally self-deluded—disputes that there has been a massive and unprecedented fall in the number of pub since 2007. It has been one of the most thoroughly reported business stories of the last few years. People have come up with alternative explanations for why the pub industry has crashed but only ASH deny that there has been a crash at all.
On her web site, Geller says: "Despite pressure from the media and members of Jessica's family who want to cover up the honor killing aspect of her murder, we are not going to change the name of the conference. Unlike those closest to her, we are going to honor Jessica's memory and stand up against the brutal practice that took her life."
Fabio & Danny's also transforms into a BYOB every Friday night, when live music is offered for free. If you're ever in Wayne, stop by for an expresso and a bowl of gluten free soup. You'll be happy you did:)
my brother asks calmly.
1st release from him..
Sent In By “Calling It Out. Like It Is”
The PM is using a strategy not seen in politics for a generation.
‘Old Dogs’ is a heist caper, a modern farce, an adventure, a Carry-On movie on acid. The twists and turns are impossible to predict and it is to her credit that no matter how ridiculous the sets of events might be she manages to make them seem entirely credible, in part because the motives of all those who inhabit the book are so deeply believable.
We also had a custom monogram made for our cocktail napkins, which we used my initials for. Some would argue that the couples monogram should be here but after long discussions we decided the brides new monogram should be on them.
Schlafly Reserve - Imperial Stout (2006)
She will sit in the front pew
Yvonne 1:28 Yvonne 1:42
Yes! It is true! If you send on planning ten (10) or more people from your organization to the Florida Literacy Conference, you will get one registration free! Registrations must be sent together. So, have one person collect all eleven (11) registrations, write a check for ten (10)! Or, collect all twenty-two (22) registrations, and write a check for twenty (20)!
“That’s right,” said the clerk. “We mark all of our herbs with both names, if we know them. We have quite a few customers that don’t know the official names of the herbs, just the folk ones. Which one are you looking for?”
you can't upload .gif files into flickr, so adding it to your blog post will require that you upload the animation gif directly from the drive that you saved it to.
Because for Moses, sacred stories are the promised land.
That eldest sister is a whirlwind, I tell ya. She travels quite a bit for her (own) business and for the first time, it brought her into my town. Well, near enough for a visit. She arrived in town last night, around 11pm. We stayed up and shared some wine, and a good deal of conversation, and she saw my scrapbooking for the first time (other than gifts I have sent). We didn't go to bed until 2am, despite both of our needing to be up by seven the next morning.
As always, I have run out of time and am just finishing last minute projects. I'm sure you have all finished your Valentine's by now, but I thought I would post the rest of mine. It might come in handy next year!
He was born in Boston in 1899 and educated at the Industrial School for Boys, a reform school, in Shirley, Massachusetts. He started in 1914, at Sam Cohen’s amateur night, where he knew Fred Allen. From the start, Rubin was an excellent hoofer. He broke in at the professional level in a tab show, with which he toured for a year, and then worked for several months on a show boat. He kicked around in burlesque for awhile, then went back into vaudeville as part of a team with a man named Charlie Hall.
Just a few years after our many attempts at "planning" (hahahahhahahahhahahhahahahahaha). I have come to realize that while planning is good, and we should not just float through life with zero direction..
We conclude Petitioner has failed to demonstrate that our refusal to consider his double jeopardy claim would result in a fundamental miscarriage of justice. Petitioner’s claim is no different from that of the petitioner in Steele, and, because a three-judge panel cannot overrule circuit precedent, see O’Driscoll v. Hercules Inc., 12 F.3d 176, 178 n. 1 (10th Cir.1994), we are bound by Steele. Like the petitioner in Steele, Petitioner claims only that his double jeopardy rights were violated. Although Petitioner’s claim that he was placed in double jeopardy by virtue of being punished for felony murder and the underlying felony is meritorious, this shows only legal innocence, which the Supreme Court has held insufficient to establish a fundamental miscarriage of justice. See Sawyer, — U.S. at —-, 112 S.Ct. at 2519. Because Petitioner has failed to supplement his constitutional double jeopardy claim with a claim that he is factually innocent of the underlying armed robbery conviction, federal habeas review of his double jeopardy claim is barred. See Steele, 11 F.3d at 1522, 1522 n. 8; see also Wallace, 12 F.3d at 826-27.
Hubbard: yes it’s good news but let’s not
Women bring a lot more to their marriage when they lack nothing but a desire for more of God, which reminds me of the quote by Max Lucado, "A woman's heart should be so hidden in God that a man has to seek Him just to find her." But of course as long as we're in the flesh we will never reach that place of complete perfection. We'll slip and we'll fall and we'll miss the mark from time to time, but it's certainly something we should press toward as we're learning to lean on God.
Then we drove to our hotel where our meeting was being held, which wasn't even in the city so there was nothing to do other than sit in the bar. I had a beer, a glass of wine and 4 martinis. This was a very bad decision on my part. Definitely not one of my shining moments of intelligence.
The only change I made was along the back neckline. The instructions say to use bias tape to finish the edge, I just serged and folded it back once. It works just the same.
I never had a chance.
Then, lets tell them that all this freedom has only one little responsibility… you CAN get pregnant if you have sex. You CAN become a mother or father the FIRST time! You, for a few minuets of pleasure, CHOOSE (because it is a choice to have sex) to become a parent. Wow, i see this as almost heroic! I was NOT ready to be a parent at ten years old! Even twenty-six felt young as a first time mother, but maybe children today are more mature and ready for parenting than I was.
So tell me, by commenting below, where do you stand with your health and what are you goals for 2009? Just writing them here will put the intention into the universe and place you closer to reaching your goal. I want to help any way I can.
The cost in human life of this latest disaster caused by the immodesty of Simone Farrow has yet to be determined... but it will undoubtedly make the lives ruined by any meth she may or may not have distributed seem insignificant.
Sylvie's party was much the same. We had picked up Papou and Fabrice at the agreed time of just after 8 from the quay where they keep their boat in Beaucaire. We then drove up to Sylvie’s house, a villa in a lottissement (posh housing estate) above Beaucaire. The French like to live in these new purpose built houses, leaving the old crumbling stone buildings to immigrants like us. When we got there we were the first. The TV was on and there was an identified boy lounging on the sofa watching an old Zorro film. The rest of the guests didn’t arrive for another hour and a half, by then we had had quite a few drinks and numerous olives and peanuts. We were 15 altogether and Sylvie had a chair crises, so various people arrived carrying chairs, which was quite convenient, as they could sit down on their own chairs as soon as they arrived.
The rest of the night all I tried to do was think of other things to keep my mind off of what was going on. I said a prayer and actually felt pretty good after it was over and I took that as a good sign. Heavenly Father knows what is best for me. When I woke up all I wanted to do was get into the doctor and see my baby and to know what was going on. Lincoln came with me this time and we were both so nervous, I couldn't stop shacking. The Doctor walked into the room and said that he was thinking about me and worrying about the baby and said he was hoping that he was just over reacting yesterday. I started crying before the ultrasound even started. The moment she was on the screen you could see her little heart beating and right at that moment you could tell she was okay. Her heart was beating perfectly. She was up to 165 bpm again. Which is normal. I started crying such a wave a relief rushed all over me. I love listening to her heart it sounded so much better then yesterday. The doctor checked her again and again to make sure she looked great and she did. I am going back in 2 weeks to make sure she stays the same.
Let’s say, oh, I don’t know, say a pretty famous blogger with over a million Twitter followers doesn’t like a fairly innocuous comment some average person makes about said blogger on their own, mere 40-follower Twitter feed. The Famous Blogger launches some expletives and the vitriol of those million followers onto the unsuspecting average Twitter gal, and then gets up on her blogger soapbox about not letting bullies get her down. Someone points out how the blogger overreacted and how she may actually be the bully in that situation, then course cooler heads prevail and the blogger apologizes for the outburst. Right? Of course not! You’re just a jealous, losery fatty fat fat for not thinking the sun shines out of that blogger’s ass!
They each made 4 chocolate nests for their mini eggs !
"No one likes to be the first guest to arrive but someone has to be the first, so you must offer the courageous early-comers confidence. I do think lots of effort should be made at the entrance in every way possible. I always have more flowers there, usually pink carnations or pink and red roses to give my guests a lift the moment they arrive. If they feel 'up' in the beginning, they can sustain that feeling throughout the entire evening."
MINOT AIR FORCE BASE INCIDENT: FAILED SMUGGLING ATTEMPT
Larita admits that her youth was stolen from her during her first marriage which concluded with her husband’s death in rather mysterious circumstances. This left her a little bitter and she now has no qualms about taking away John’s youth. Perhaps as a result, this staunchly American outsider can at times be difficult to warm to except on the occasions when she locks into battle with THE Mrs. Whittaker (Scott Thomas), whom many audiences will feel utter disdain for due to her prim and condescending manner.
I lingered outside the theatre until everyone went in. People were still picking up tickets from will call. Then a couple came, and a guy asked them if they needed one ticket, because he had one extra. The couple said OK, but when they asked for another ticket, the person at the booth told them it was sold out. “I don’t want to wait around 10″, the guy said. But he already had bought the other guy’s extra ticket. “I can take it off your hands”, I offered. “Oh, yeah? That’d be great”, he said, so I got my ticket.
and the truth of it is that neither of these things
Must be able & interested in helping to develop a Mature-rated, artistic, colorful environment that offers new & old residents a place to relax, shop, meet, talk, have fun, & create positive memories.
Some authors use the word “odyssey” to simply represent a journey or a passage of time. In Lily’s Odyssey author Carol Smallwood takes a more literal approach. Just as Odysseus spends years making his way home after the Trojan War, Lily struggles to find her true home in the world.
These art trends challenge the legal definition of "artwork", because of the discrepancy existing between what can be considered art in the art world and what can be deemed art according to legal standards.
Article 130
Yes, four months after my Mom passed away.
piercing eyes,
“I don’t understand what you mean!” Lucy exclaimed. It was obvious that she was nervous now. She sprang up from her seat and the yellow florescent light flickered above her. “Why am I alone?”
Drake drew her bottom lip into his mouth and gently suckled on it before slowly kissing his way along the delicate curve of her jaw. Simone clutched his shoulders and tilted her head back. He eagerly trailed a path of hot kisses down her neck, then back up, his mouth finding hers again. Simone looped her arms around his neck, pulling him in even closer as their tongues met.
to express yourself by speaking – “I want to talk to my people about the changes that are coming.”;
We got up Saturday morning, checked out of our hostel, went and saw the Guggenheim, this time from the inside, and then we caught the hour and ten minute train to San Sebastian. We walked to our hostel, still in the rain, checked in, then took to exploring the city a bit. We met up with some girl from New Zealand that Tom and Angel had met before I arrived in Bilbao. Together, we all went and ate pintxos, which are Basque tapas and are over-priced, but delicious.
Goodmorning (it’s 9.27 am here in Sweden). Today we have to go visit my midwife and baby seems very excited about it, he is super active!
"My beloved Barley." He tilted the letter and began again. "My beloved Barley, Do you remember a promise you made to me one night in Peredelkino as we lay on the verandah of our friends' dacha and recited to each other the poetry of a great Russian mystic who loved England? You swore to me that you would always prefer humanity to nations and that when the day came you would act like a decent human being."
On the final day of the conference, the participants visited the exhibition of Count Aleksey Bobrinskoy held at the Russian Museum of Ethnography in Saint Petersburg. The exhibition was devoted to the 150th birth anniversary of this outstanding Russian scholar, who made original contributions to research in the field of traditional art and culture of Russian people, as well as the peoples of the Pamirs.
51 Tamal Vista Blvd.
“So when the PACB approved the Nets project,” Brennan noted, the revised regulation had already been proposed by IRS and was then effectively implemented, because nobody could get any financing when it was on the table. So the PACB’s approval, he said, making the point again, occurred after a regulation was on the table that would effectively shut out tax-exempt financing for the arena
It was a very special occasion made all the more special because Juli is disabled - she has cerebral palsy and is profoundly deaf - and so this accomplishment is all the more hard won by her. So to Juli, HNDip Accounting, here's my tribute to you.
She's a really good big sister, and creates hugely imaginative games for her and little sis to play.
Future ambitions for this blog is to travel more, get more local estranged beer on here and get some beer swapping done with people from throughout the UK and further. If you would be interested in this email me on smurray91@hotmail.co.uk to organise any swaps. Apart from this keep listening and hopefully there will be more very soon. Cheers.
I collected knowledge very slowly. Fortunately (and I suppose inevitably) as I continued my relationship with boats information came in as relentlessly as the tide. So as a result my pool of knowledge very gradually became deeper. Unfortunately, also in keeping with my metaphor of the tide, my knowledge seemed to go out too. Knowledge I was so happy to finally possess would recede and be gone several hours later. I am not altogether certain this phenomenon was due to natural causes or if it was exacerbated by frequent infusions of Myers’ Rum and light beer but I guess those are a couple of the reasons it has taken such a long time to assemble the permanent stockpile of knowledge I now supposedly posses. Of course now I am so old I have difficulty remembering the knowledge anyway.
The meeting culminated with a question and answer session from the gathered crowd, with Mr Sproule, Mr Lumby and West Midlands regional organiser Alwyn Deacon answering all the issues raised.
The chicken craze seems to be dying down but that doesn’t mean that having a backyard farm is out. Considering we go through close to two-dozen eggs a week, a few chickens would be a sound investment.
The pumpkin seed bagel came in really handy for the large burst of carbohydrates my body was screaming for. I had it with an omelette and some salsa. Then I got to work on making salads because our guests were coming for lunch instead of dinner. Only one friend ended up making it though. Man trouble I hear! Oh well, a small BBQ is still very acceptable.
To be honest, I left that glitter glue on my floor for a while. I actually thought it was kind of cute. But I never realized I had glitter glue on my freaking shoes until I was unpacking on our trip. That one thing brought back such a fun little memory. And let's not forget the spare (clean, of course) diaper I found in my purse or half the plastic Easter egg that was also floating around in there.
I’ve already packed my gym bag and put it in the car, all ready for a straight-to-the-gym workout right after school. Elliptical machine, here I come!!
He hopes to eventually build a kitchen downstairs in the basement when they make enough money.
Georgia – Body Movers by Stephanie Bond
My mind is not in a very good place on the friendship scale. Of late, several friends--or women I thought were friends--revealed themselves to be manipulators who availed themselves to my good nature, helpfulness, compassion, then cut me loose when my utility to them had run its course. In short, they used me.
VOODOO GUY - You were the ones who started it! You wanted to defy Hell, And now Hell has accepted the challenge!
I haven’t been very joyous lately. Especially when it comes to money and my certain lack of it. I keep remembering when God brought the Israelites out of Egypt and they kept forgetting what God had done for them and the miracles that he had performed. And I sit and read about that and think that they were being so stupid because they were so quick to forget what God had done. Then, I look at my own life and the ways that God has been working and find that I am doing the exact same thing. I am so quick to forget what God has already done and I am so quick to think that He can’t do it again. My God is bigger than my problems and I want to seriously live like He is.
A ﬁrst-century martyr named Stephen would have understood their choice. He also chose to love those who caused him pain. He was seized and accused of blasphemy because he proclaimed that Jesus was the Messiah and the Son of God. Stephen chose to aﬃrm his faith and defend it biblically. His accusers responded by ston- ing him. As he was on the brink of death, he prayed for his execu- tioners. Acts 7:60 tells us that he “fell on his knees and cried out, ‘Lord, do not hold this sin against them.’ When he had said this, he fell asleep.”
Soon the young Swiss college group grew and within a year there were twenty students meeting regularly for prayer, silence, meditation and confession; Roger had stripped his protestant faith down to the core, focusing only on what it meant to lead a Christ-centered life in community with others. He began dreaming of a house where this might be lived out and, at the end of the war, he found that is was time. “The defeat of France awoke powerful sympathy,” Brother Roger wrote years later. “If a house could be found there, of the kind we had dreamed of, it would offer a possible way of assisting some of those most discouraged, those deprived of work; and it could become a place of silence and work.”
I was first accused of cynicism at the age of 11 (true story), so it would ill behove me to be too trusting of our rulers or - come to that - of Uncle Sam's rulers, but some 77% think that the US of A would be better off if they aped public opinion. Note that 8% of Americans think Elvis might be alive, and 20% think Obama is a Muslim. Republicans skew towards a greater belief in the public's good sense (81%) than Democrats (73%). Higher levels of education correlate with lesser faith in public opinion - 28% of post grads think the US would be worse off if it followed public opinion, compared to 14% for those with just high school education.
Many times I've hired a repairman who comes and performs what ends up being a 5 second task because he has the appropriate tools. I locked my keys in my car once and called a locksmith. Within 10 seconds of arriving he had picked the lock and had the car open. It took him 4 times as long to write out the invoice than it did to open the car. I once had a furnace guy come out who used a special flexible camera to inspect a part of the furnace that was hard to get to. It was cool, but I paid out the nose for the use of his gadgetry.
He could have called ten thousand angels
It was a cool(ish) day, but the pool still felt nice,
Ph: 812-988-6000
"In real life most of what people say to each other is drivel. Transcripts of genuine dialogue, as in police wire taps, is a chronicle of halting, disjointed, nonlinear incoherence. Really, it's a wonder that we understand each other. Dialogue in novels is, thank goodness, unnatural. The author has time to think it through" (THE FIRE IN FICTION, p.190).
This level 1 Hello Reader is a great book for your beginning readers to read during your Valentine's Day activity filled day. This book has many sight words and super fun illustrations for the picture support your young readers need.
When I began thinking about how I got my agent, the savvy and sweet Michael Bourret with Dystel & Goderich, I realized there were a series of steps that led me to that thrilling moment.
That is the assembly manual for that new sump pump with a battery backup. ("...Irony...")
What You’ll Need
First American woman mystery writer – Anne Katherine Green, educated at Poultney College in Vermont, began a prolific writing career, in 1878, with her series detective Ebenezer Gryce of the New York Police Department in The Leavenworth Case.
“Thus interdependence is a fundamental law of nature. Not only higher forms of life but also many of the smallest insects are social beings who, without any religion, law, or education, survive by mutual cooperation based on an innate recognition of their interconnectedness. The most subtle level of material phenomena is also governed by interdependence. All phenomena, from the planet we inhabit to the oceans, clouds, forests, and flowers that surround us, arise in dependence upon subtle patterns of energy. Without their proper interaction, they dissolve and decay."
As this BBC report shows looking at the income of the top 10% of incomes is pretty meaningless. It shows that whilst the average for this group was almost £50,000, the average for the top 1% was three times that amount. Obviously then the average for the lowest 1% of that top 10%, would be considerably less than the £50,000 average. And, if we look at the top 0.1% we find that the average for this group is £780,000 p.a. Or more than 5 times the average for the top 1%. But, if we look at even that figure we would find that it understates just how concentrated high incomes are, let alone how concentrated wealth is.
Good morning everyone. My name is Anton. I’m a student of MIPT. Today in my presentation, I’m going to speak about Software Design patterns. My presentation will take about 15 minutes. Feel free to interrupt me and ask a question.
put the contestant and tidy it settle they’re beingness ejected.
Typically called “the earliest Christian hymnbook”, the Odes of Solomon are controversial in how proto-orthodox Christian or gnostic they are. Whatever the case, they are undeniably poetic and intriguing. You can learn more here and here. J. Rendel Harris’ foundational scholarly translation is available here.
AK: In French Lessons I write about my first soufflé on the Place Dauphine, when I was fifteen. But that’s not a memory anymore — it’s a story. I was invited to lunch just last week by French friends here in Connecticut, to watch the first round of the French elections. They prepared an indoor picnic: a winter salad of beets and endives, nuts and banana; slices of foie gras, and champagne to drink. There was affection all around the table, new friends, a sense of history and debate, and children learning. It was a moment I’ll remember for a long time.
…And now here is my secret, a very simple secret: It is only with the heart that one can see rightly; what is essential is invisible to the eye.
Last but not least, we were honored to have Rotary International President Elect Sakuji Tanaka present for the conference. In addition to hearing him speak, I had the pleasure of talking with him and getting a photo with him, seen below.
It challenges us to remember that the people that seem the most un-like us aren't that different at all.
“The abodes of Fohat are many,” it is said. “He places his four fiery (electro-positive) Sons in the “Four circles”; these Circles are the Equator, the Ecliptic, and the two parallels of declination, or the tropics—to preside over the climates of which are placed the Four mystical Entities. Then again: “Other seven (sons) are commissioned to preside over the seven hot, and seven cold lokas (the hells of the orthodox Brahmins) at the two ends of the Egg of Matter (our Earth and its poles). The seven lokas are also called the “Rings,” elsewhere, and the “Circles.” The ancients made the polar circles seven instead of two, as Europeans do; for Mount Meru, which is the North Pole, is said to have seven gold and seven silver steps leading to it.
“When Thomas Nephew first came to speak to us on this matter… it was his single voice. And, I’m just speaking for myself, I didn’t know what the NDAA was. Now I do. And I didn’t understand much of what was being spoken about. And having one voice is better than zero voices, but my feeling at that time was where’s the context, where’s the army of people, how do I figure out how Takoma Park is supposed to be effective. Over the past several weeks, the numbers have grown, and there’s no substitute for warm bodies in a public forum…. And that’s what you’ve accomplished here tonight on both of these questions. So I’m in favor of supporting resolutions on both of these items, because I think the case has been well made.”
Thanks so much pals and gals! You guys are great!
Have I told you why the nights are long when you're not with me
3: I curse.
She jabbed her arm out suddenly, real impolite.
Don’t believe me? Read that passage out aloud.
Five years since Forest City Ratner debuted its plans for an arena and skyscraper complex in the Prospect Heights section of Brooklyn, hundreds of millions of taxpayer dollars have been spent, hundreds of residents have been displaced, historic buildings have been destroyed, businesses have been driven out, and profound blight has been created by the developer. Now the developer has announced that all work on the project has stopped and there is no timetable for future activity.
The final master plan report was originally expected for November 2008.
Under the Quilt of Night, which includes a great author's note about Hopkinson's research into the history and folklore of the Underground Railroad.
I knew, though, I was ready to be serious with someone.
Name and location
I managed to wrangle a date via a phone call whose tactics I forget, and in due time this involved steady dating. This, alas, was not tantamount to sleeping together, which, smitten and devoted as I was, I considered a rightful development. Much about my courtship I can no longer recall.
- Use a tray that enables the placement of a grid on top.
If you are an immigrant spouse on an F2 or H4, then I feel your pain. We come all this way sacrificing a large part of our identity in the hope that things will work out. It is a struggle, but eventually things do work out. They may not fit your plan, but really, maybe your plan was not so perfect after all.
Pro: easy
842 ***D-XI/28/1982. “On Giving Thanks in Dark Times.” Lake Shore Unitarian Universalist Society, Winnetka, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 596-601 (1992).)
The second weekend, we attended an all day class at the Memory Box store with Angie Hunt accompanied by Mindy Baxter. In the morning we had the "Color Techniques with Copic" and in the afternoon the "Color Techniques with Distress Inks". Yep, I don't give up with those inks...
So that was it for today and i hope you enjoyed it. Just always try to find different uses for one die and you will double or triple your collection, lol! Don't forget to take a chance at our weekly challenge and maybe win a 20$ shopping spree to buy some new dies. Take care, love from France, Kianel.
and everything was blissful.
One of the cooler things we got to do while we were there was go do some tie-dye with the kids. Part of what I loved is that every parent in our camp had bought a pack of plain white t-shirts for their kids to dye, and every family brought all the t-shirts just in case another family forgot to bring some. I love how we take care of each other!
Bear Pk+Slab from Cragmoor. Hiking the whole way did 46:10 to the summit (much too flat between Crag and the mouth to warrant a hike, but my shin is still limiting me) and 23:00 from the mouth of Fern to the top. Felt pretty good about hiking the canyon in 10:15 (Horn)/12:45 (to the summit). Slab lap was quick, and then I ran the 18min back down to Cragmoor from behind the Slab with moderate babying of the shin.
Ahhh! So much better :)
With a battery capacity of 92 kWh, this supercar delivers 1088 hp which can take you to 62 mph in 2.8 seconds, with a top speed of 190 mph.
I love this shot of my parents:o)
-place dumplings into pan, and leave till it starts getting crispy underneath
I didn’t know it was full of people until I was already upon it. Above the busted headlight I glimpsed the driver and realized she’d been watching me and my self-satisfied amble for quite a few car lengths. I diverted to give respectful distance to the nub of her rearview, but I was close enough to smell the stale upholstery, to touch duct tape holding her door together, the rust and the gashes and the mismatched paint. The engine was turned off, and the back window was closed. The glass reflected the passing orb of my T.J Maxx purse, and also the faces of three babies inside – one sleeping in a hot car seat, two curly headed toddlers squirming in the sun beside her, an older one in the passenger seat. So many little bodies, like a pile of kittens nesting in trash, so trusting of the shitty world that apparently gave them life and nothing else.
Mommy waved him away with another grand gesture. “Go, go, I know how it is for working men. I used to be one. Go home and tuck the boys in, give Lisa one for me.”
Legend has it that the sculpture pays tribute to an overly-ambitious builder who died while similarly holding up a heavy block as it was being sealed into the building. It is now thought however that the sculpture was simply put there to embellish the premises and that it was modelled on one Jean-Louis Fargue, a reputedly strong builder who played a major part in its construction.
calligraphy from an alien hand, and I know you’re “supposed”
She yawns and orbits into view,
I'm hoping she feels better just being at school today. They were going to be doing some fun projects and I didn't want her to miss them.
There were all kinds of people gathered round the table, but not necessarily the sort of people you'd imagine at such a meeting.
This is an acitivity that my students did when we first began
An est program might be considered an accumulation vital documents, each and every associated with a specific lifestyle function or perhaps problem, for example money of your believe in, as well as health care directives. Some basic papers tend to be:
1/4 cup butter (softened)
But here’s the thing. I think they got it right.
… I doubt it needs to be said that scenario B is the more common of the two. But it is all worth it for the emotions that pour forth and the end result that is created when I finally get into a rhythm, the words come easily, and the characters take on a life of their own.
It was in this spirit of enlightened self-interest that I replied some weeks ago to a telephone call from someone who identified himself as with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and who announced that he had questions to ask about Bernard Weisberg who was being considered for appointment to the post of United States Magistrate in the Northern District of Illinois. My immediate response was, “This is certainly good news. You should not let him get away.” My delight upon hearing this news has been matched by that of many of you here who know Bernie Weisberg and who know as well of the enhanced duties of the magistrates in this district. The enthusiasm in the legal community which has greeted his appointment reflects a general awareness of his character and career, both of which I presume to say something about during the ten minutes allotted to me on this happy occasion.
I have always found it funny that Lupus was symbolized with a butterfly because I have always felt more like a bat:
As the song says, it doesn’t mean I wasn’t thinking about all of you out there, blog followers, and fellow WANA’ers. I will be catching up and getting back in the round of reading, following, blogging and tweeting away this week.
Danny Devito and Nathan Lane were among the many actors considered for the role of George Costanza.
Nowadays it seems like we can’t turn on the TV without seeing an advert for a talent show. Since Pop Idol burst on our screens in 2001 it seems like the British public have become obsessed with these type of shows. Even though they claim to all have different formats, they all have certain elements. Usually they have 4 judges, a rather judgemental audience and a sob story to help them become appealing to the judges. Seems like you can’t get through one of these competitions without having a sob story
That's been my week so far, how's your week going?
Today on your birthday I am overcome with the need to express to you just how amazingly nice you are! In the new fangled dictionary beside the word amazing is a picture of you. You, my dear Jen with one “n” are simply the picture of strength, grace, positivity and just plain awesomeness. Enjoy this birthday! Go forth and drink too much wine . . . each too much cake . . . . and do a little sexy dance for Mark . . . NAKED!!
Fifteen months ago, while recovering from surgery, I experienced the worst pain I can remember. Last week I suffered a herniated disc that hit similar levels on the pain scale. It was a mercy when parts of my left leg and foot became numb. I ended up in the Emergency Room.
Most agree that taxes should be both fair and equal. If a locality decides that some people deserve inequitable tax treatment, oversight is a good idea. While removing or reducing taxes based on age or ability is a noble thing, it must be balanced with fact that you are simply shifting the tax burden to others."
She was Albatross and a giant star
On the way home the taxi driver tried to charge me 3 soles instead of 2.50 soles, don’t even worry I told him what was up and he won’t try to pull that business again!
‘Sporting events such as the World Cup are always important but they are usually confined to England and you wouldn’t expect to sell products marked with the St George’s Cross in Scotland. ‘But to have both the Diamond Jubilee and the Olympic Games in one summer offers a unique opportunity to capture the imagination of Britain as a whole.
As if we hadn’t gotten enough prawns already, we are then treated to pad thai noodles with prawns and also massaman beef curry with rice as the mains and by this stage, I was already getting rather full. The pad thai was tomatoey, with the requisite crunchy bean sprouts, tofu cubes, peanut shavings and shallots tossed in throughout the springy noodles but also with a lemon wedge and a sprinkle of sugar and chilli flakes on the side to mix in to taste if you want more flavour. I don’t think the dish needs any extra flavouring because it tastes pretty delicious on its own and we gobble it up.
My dentist used this amazing laser machine that somehow just burns off excess gum. Dude... It's not even painful. I actually fell asleep. And it took only about 1 hour plus!
The ending could be a tidy wrap-up for a stand-alone book, or it could lead to a series, and I would like to see that universe expand.
What is sex to a woman? A moment of intimacy, a “deed” or a job.
Are you training enough? Are you fit enough? Are you strong enough?
When the meat is done, cut into slices and serve with some of the sauce poured over. We ate ours with plain boiled basmati rice and spinach, picked only an hour before from the garden, which was simply steamed.
What if the battles regarding Ground Zero and the West Side Stadium hadn’t sucked up so much media attention?
Crunchy Muffy Sushi Rolls: I have stayed away from sushi throughout my entire pregnancy until now. I didn't want to tempt myself since I can't eat tuna rolls (which are my favorite), but I caved and got another non-tuna roll version instead. And Oh Boy! was it yummy
When you add your OWN blog button, you do not need to insert an address...
In reality, this mythology has about as much to do with reality as the big bad wolf blowing down grandmother’s house.
a) I hit exactly 100,000 words on April 14th! My goal was to have that word count by the 15th, so I'm like dying with excitement about that!
2 Tbs. butter
On our following attempts, we cut back. The following batches of pistachio and orange were good, even with half a vial, and I don't regret those.
For the board part, Calvin cut to size a piece of really thin particle board stuff...I'm not really sure what it is called, but you can get a big piece of it at Home Depot for $10. Then I primed and painted it and attached the board to the frame with a staple gun. As you can see from the smudges on the board, I have been using it. It's been great to jot down quick reminders and grocery items we need.
let me die in your arms
Six hours of being stuck in a car, and no food except the Nanaimo bars and a couple of bananas. These truly gave us some delight and some much needed energy. We had originally got a whole bunch for our friends in San Jose but ahem... got into the gift basket before them :) They did get some though, and LOVED them.
And they’d come there with men much like me
The pressure is on!
Have you ever thought back to the first book you read that started your love affair with books?
The above photograph of Piccadilly Circus was taken around noontime on a busy weekday. (I made sure not to include any of that damn scaffolding.)
Blackbirds and the sun of October
